


Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 





















Warner Music Group | WMG




























Skip directly to content























 































 










 









 









 




















 








Homepage Video



 

  
  
 WMG Intro 
  
 http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/340485632/340485632_4817584351001_4817566088001.mp4 
  
  

 http://www.beberexha.com/ 
 Bebe Rexha - I Got You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2685/301939184_5386109686001_5386083529001.mp4 
  
 Bebe Rexha 
 I Got You 

 http://www.twentyonepilots.com/ 
 Twenty One Pilots - Heathens 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166896968001_5166880568001.mp4 
  
 Twenty One Pilots 
 Heathens 

 http://www.garyclarkjr.com/ 
 Gary Clark Jr. - The Healing 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/645/301939184_5386110933001_5386082540001.mp4 
  
 Gary Clark Jr.  
 The Healing 

 http://www.brunomars.com 
 Bruno Mars - That's What I Like 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2595/301939184_5386109697001_5386085565001.mp4 
  
 Bruno Mars 
 That's What I Like 

 http://cleanbandit.co.uk/ 
 Clean Bandit - Rockabye 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/1645/301939184_5386109909001_5386082539001.mp4 
  
 Clean Bandit 
 Rockabye 

 http://www.ledzeppelin.com/ 
 Led Zeppelin - Whole Lotta Love 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443837830001_4443781701001.mp4 
  
 Led Zeppelin 
 Whole Lotta Love 

 http://www.greenday.com 
 Green Day - Bang Bang 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166810316001_5166783632001.mp4 
  
 Green Day 
 Bang Bang 

 https://www.thedoors.com/ 
 The Doors - Break On Through (To The Other Side) 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443848605001_4443809358001.mp4 
  
 The Doors 
 Break On Through (To The Other Side) 

 http://www.edsheeran.com/ 
 Ed Sheeran - Shape of You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/3859/301939184_5386109614001_5386088907001.mp4 
  
 Ed Sheeran 
 Shape of You 
 




 
 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 












Recorded Music
Recorded MusicWMG’s family of labels—including Atlantic Records Group, Warner Bros. Records Inc., and Parlophone—is among the most prominent and successful in the history of music, encompassing a global roster of acclaimed artists and an unparalleled catalog including many of the world's most popular and influential recordings.
      		
      	



Publishing
PublishingWarner/Chappell Music, the global music publishing company of WMG, is home to an extraordinary catalog that includes timeless standards and contemporary hits, representing works by over 65,000 songwriters and composers, with a collection of more than one million copyrights. Warner/Chappell also includes Warner/Chappell Production Music.

      		



Artist Services
 Artist ServicesFor more than four decades, WMG has been an industry-leading force in providing a world-class array of services designed to help artists and labels grow their careers and their businesses. Artist & Label Services is the umbrella for WEA (Warner-Elektra-Atlantic) – the pioneering WEA distribution and marketing network – and Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) – the groundbreaking global distribution company for independent artists and labels.

      		



Culture
CultureWMG embraces a unique collection of world-renowned companies with distinct cultures, while embodying one unifying principle: it’s all about the music. The people of WMG are driven by a creative, independent spirit that stems from the company’s deep history in nurturing entrepreneurial thinking and artist-focused innovation.

      		



News



Careers

 






 




















 














 




























home onepage b

 





















 




 


 

































  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 









 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 




































Culture | Warner Music Group






























Skip directly to content























 
































 









 




















 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 






 







 

































 





















You are hereHome 
















Culture

 










WMG embraces a unique collection of world-renowned companies with distinct cultures, while embodying one unifying principle: it’s all about the music. 
The people of WMG are driven by a creative spirit that stems from the company’s deep history in nurturing entrepreneurial thinking and artist-focused innovation.  
 











 




 











Leadership



  
  
 Stu Bergen 
 CEO, International and Global Commercial Services 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Stu Bergen
CEO, International and Global Commercial Services
Warner Music Group
 Stu Bergen is CEO, International and Global Commercial Services, Warner Music Group. Stu oversees WMG’s international Recorded Music operations outside the U.S. and UK; Warner Music’s Global Marketing team; WEA and ADA – WMG’s Artist & Label Services divisions; and Warner Classics. He previously served as Warner Music Group’s President, International, Recorded Music, and before that, he was Executive Vice President, International & Head of Global Marketing.
Prior to WMG, Stu held posts at several major record labels, including serving as EVP of Rock Music for Columbia Records, EVP of Island Records, and VP of Promotion for Epic Records. He began his music industry career in 1988 at TVT Records, following which he became Director Promotion at Relativity Records. Stu holds a BA degree from Princeton University.








 

  
 Mike Caren 
 Creative Officer 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Mike Caren
Creative Officer
Warner Music Group
 Working across Warner Music’s legendary labels, such as Atlantic, Elektra, and Warner Bros. Records, as well as its international affiliates, Mike provides wide-ranging creative leadership and support to the company’s artist development activities. He serves as an advisor to the company's global A&R team, while discovering new artists and nurturing existing signings.
Previously, Mike was President, Worldwide A&R, Warner Music Group, and before that, Executive Vice President, A&R, Atlantic Records. In the last decade alone, he has been responsible for signing more than fifteen artists that have released Gold and Platinum-selling records, including Trey Songz, T.I., Flo Rida, and B.o.B. Mike has also produced records for Kanye West, Jennifer Lopez, David Guetta, Cobra Starship, Jem, and Asher Roth. Mike began his career with WMG at Atlantic in 1995, at the label's Big Beat imprint, following roles at SRC/Loud Records and Ruthless Records.








 

  
 John Esposito 
 Chairman & CEO 
 Warner Music Nashville 
 

nothing



John Esposito
Chairman & CEO
Warner Music Nashville
 John Esposito is Chairman & CEO of Warner Music Nashville, where he oversees the company’s country music division – including Warner Bros. Nashville and Atlantic Nashville. John, who has held this post since 2009, was previously President and CEO of WEA Corp., WMG’s sales and marketing division, while also overseeing Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) and Independent Label Group (ILG).
John joined WMG in 2002 from The Island Def Jam Music Group (IDJ) where, as General Manager/Executive Vice President, he managed the company’s day-to-day operational activities. Prior to IDJ, John held a variety of executive positions at PolyGram, Inc. Before joining PolyGram, from 1993 to 1994, he was the chief operating officer of music and movies at The Wiz retail chain. From 1986 to 1993, John was Regional Vice President of Mitsubishi Electronics America, where he managed the sales and operations staff.








 

  
 Julie Greenwald 
 Chairman & COO 
 Atlantic Records Group 
 

nothing



Julie Greenwald
Chairman & COO
Atlantic Records Group
 Julie Greenwald joined Atlantic Records as President in 2004 and was named Chairman & COO in 2009. As with her Atlantic partner Craig Kallman, Julie came from the indie label world. The New York native began her music career in 1992 at Def Jam Records, and just a decade later, she was named President of Island Records, becoming one of the rare women to hold that title at a major label. 
After graduating from Tulane University in 1992 with a double major in Political Science and English, Julie joined Def Jam, where she rapidly rose through the company’s executive ranks, becoming General Manager of Promotion and later Head of Marketing, helping shape the company into an urban music powerhouse. In 1998, with the merger of Island Records and Def Jam, Julie was charged with overseeing the entire combined marketing department, spanning genres from hip-hop to rock. In 2002, she was named President of Island Records/EVP of the Island Def Jam Music Group. With her arrival at Atlantic Records two years later, she played a central role in the re-architecting of one of the industry’s most iconic labels.
Julie has been ranked four times in the No. 1 position on Billboard's “Women in Music/Power Players” list and has also been featured as one of The Hollywood Reporter's “Power 100 Women in Entertainment” as well as being named to Newsweek's “Women In Leadership” roster.








 

  
 Tim Fraser-Harding 
 President, Global Catalog, Recorded Music 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Tim Fraser-Harding
President, Global Catalog, Recorded Music
Warner Music Group
 Tim Fraser-Harding is Warner Music Group’s President, Global Catalog, Recorded Music. Based in London, he oversees global strategy and operations for all aspects of the development and marketing of WMG’s rich legacy of recorded music – which includes classic repertoire from iconic labels such as Atlantic, Elektra, Warner Bros., and Parlophone. Tim’s responsibilities include spearheading worldwide campaigns, identifying and implementing innovative product initiatives, and advancing the company’s digital catalog strategy.
Tim joined WMG in 2012 from Sony Music, where he held a number of senior posts, including VP, International Catalog Marketing Group. During his tenure at Sony, he was responsible for catalog operations across multiple territories, working in tandem with local affiliates, repertoire owners and management to plan and execute high-profile marketing campaigns. Tim began his career in retail, with stints at HMV and WH Smith, where he was Marketing Manager for catalog across 300 stores.








 

  
 Craig Kallman 
 Chairman & CEO 
 Atlantic Records Group 
 

nothing



Craig Kallman
Chairman & CEO
Atlantic Records Group
 Craig Kallman carries on the entrepreneurial tradition that has driven Atlantic Records since its founding by Ahmet Ertegun nearly seven decades ago. Craig joined the company in 1991, when the company acquired his independent Big Beat Records label.  Advancing through the executive ranks, he began to oversee Atlantic’s entire A&R operation. In 2005, the New York native was named Chairman/CEO of the Atlantic Records Group. As one of the rare major label chief executives today with hands-on record-producing experience, Craig is Atlantic’s musical director and creative collaborator with the label’s rich diversity of high-profile artists. 
A passionate music fan, obsessive record collector (with an archive now numbering 750,000 vinyl albums and counting), and avid audiophile, Craig began his music industry career while still in high school. He started out by DJ-ing at the Cat Club in New York, while working in Columbia Records' dance department. At Brown University, he was the CBS Records college representative, programmed urban and rock specialty shows on WBRU-FM, and ran a legendary series of campus dance parties. After graduating in 1987, Craig worked for Factory Records and Billboard magazine, while DJ-ing at such legendary nightspots as Danceteria, Area, The Palladium, and The Tunnel – spinning boundary-crossing sets drawn from his vast collection. Fresh out of college, he started the Big Beat label in his bedroom, selling dance records on the street from a shopping cart. Just four years later, Craig's success drew the attention of Atlantic Records and he became part of the WMG family.








 

  
 Max Lousada 
 Chairman & CEO 
 Warner Music UK 
 

nothing



Max Lousada
Chairman & CEO
Warner Music UK
 Max Lousada is Chairman & CEO of Warner Music UK (WMUK) and is responsible for overseeing the UK family of labels and imprints, including Atlantic Records, Asylum, East West, FFRR, Nonesuch, One More Tune, Parlophone, Reprise, Roadrunner, Rhino and Warner Bros Records, as well as the UK arm of ADA and Warner Music Artist and Label Services.
Max previously headed up Atlantic Records UK for nine years, during which time he built an award-winning team and a strong roster of artists, including: Ed Sheeran, Paolo Nutini, James Blunt, Rudimental, Plan B, Lykke Li, Rumer, Marina and the Diamonds and Birdy. Max also presided over the UK success of Atlantic's international roster including acts such Bruno Mars, Fun., Paramore, Death Cab For Cutie, Jason Mraz and Janelle Monáe.
Prior to Atlantic, Max was head of A&R at Mushroom Records where he signed ambient dance act Zero 7 and played a key role in the development of their 2001 debut album Simple Things. Max was also involved in the careers of Mushroom acts such as Muse, Ash and Garbage.
In June 2014, Max was named Chairman of the BRITs Committee, which is responsible for the creative direction of the show, management of the Award categories, artist line up, Voting Academy and the digital and media strategy.








 

  
 Jon Platt 
 Chairman & CEO 
 Warner/Chappell Music 
 

nothing



Jon Platt
Chairman & CEO
Warner/Chappell Music
 Jon Platt is Chairman & CEO for Warner/Chappell Music, WMG’s music publishing arm, overseeing and driving the ongoing growth of the company, its diverse roster of songwriters, and its range of creative services. 
Since joining WCM in 2012, he has been instrumental in attracting a wide range of new and established talent including Jay Z, Beyoncé, Roc Nation’s publishing roster, Mike WiLL Made It, and Aloe Blacc, among others, while continuing to build relationships with songwriters such as Katy Perry, Nate Ruess, Michael Bublé, Barry Gibb and George Michael. Under Jon's creative leadership, WCM was recently named Publisher of the Year at four of ASCAP's most prestigious ceremonies – the Pop, Rhythm & Soul, Country and Latin Awards – as well as at BMI’s R&B/Hip-Hop Awards, all within a year's time.
Jon previously spent 17 years at EMI Music Publishing, where artists/songwriters he signed at the outset of their careers included JAY Z, Kanye West, Usher, Drake, Ludacris, Mary Mary, Young Jeezy, Fabolous, and Snoop Dogg. He also signed Beyoncé and negotiated deals for Pharrell Williams and Sean “Puffy” Combs. 
Jon has also served as Vice Chairman of the Board of Directors for the MusiCares Foundation, and sits on the Board of the Living Legends Foundation. He was the first music publisher to be featured in Source magazine’s annual Power 30 issue, was named 2011 Music Visionary of the Year by the UJA-Federation of New York, and in 2015 received the Visionary Award at the annual SESAC Pop Music Awards. He began his career in the music business as a DJ in his native Denver, before moving to Los Angeles to manage producers.








 

  
 Cameron Strang 
 Chairman & CEO 
 Warner Bros. Records 
 

nothing



Cameron Strang
Chairman & CEO
Warner Bros. Records
 Cameron Strang is Chairman & CEO of Warner Bros. Records (WBR), one of the flagship labels of Warner Music Group, and home to many of the most influential and innovative artists of our time.
Cameron previously served as Chairman & CEO of Warner/Chappell Music (WCM), WMG's publishing arm. Prior, Cameron was the founder of Southside Independent Music Publishing, which was formed in 2004 and acquired by Warner/Chappell in 2010. He was also the founder of the independent New West Records label, which was launched in 1998. Southside grew to become a leading indie publisher, including acclaimed writers and producers such as Bruno Mars, Kings of Leon, Ashley Gorley, Blair Daly, Matthew West, and Brody Brown. New West’s impressive roster has included Steve Earle, Dwight Yoakam, Kris Kristofferson, Rickie Lee Jones, Drive By Truckers, Delbert McClinton, Ben Lee, Old 97’s, Buddy and Julie Miller, and many others. New West also acquired the Texas Music Group, including the Antone’s and Watermelon labels, and released the award-winning soundtrack to the film 'Crazy Heart'.
Cameron graduated from University of British Columbia Law School in 1992. He practiced law for several years in his hometown of Vancouver, Canada, before embarking on his music industry career. 
 








 

  
 Stephen F. Cooper 
 CEO 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Stephen F. Cooper
CEO
Warner Music Group
Stephen F. Cooper is Chief Executive Officer of Warner Music Group, which he joined in 2011 upon the company’s acquisition by Access Industries. He is a member of the Supervisory Board for LyondellBasell Industries N.V., one of the world’s largest olefins, polyolefins, chemicals and refining companies. Steve is an advisor at Zolfo Cooper, a leading financial advisory and interim management firm, of which he was a co-founder and former Chairman. Steve is also Managing Partner of Cooper Investment Partners, a private equity firm. He has more than 30 years of experience as a financial advisor, and has served as chairman or chief executive officer of various businesses, including Vice Chairman and member of the office of Chief Executive Officer of Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc. and Chief Executive Officer of Hawaiian Telcom. 
Steve received a B.A. from Occidental College and an M.B.A. from the University of Pennsylvania Wharton School of Business.







 

  
 Eric Levin 
 Executive Vice President & CFO 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Eric Levin
Executive Vice President & CFO
Warner Music Group
 Eric Levin is Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, Warner Music Group, a role in which he is responsible for the company’s worldwide financial operations. He joined the company in 2014, having held a number of senior executive posts in the US and Greater China. In 2012, he joined Ecolab Inc., the multinational technology and manufacturing group, as the Regional Controller & CFO for its North Asia Region. Before that, beginning in 2009, he was Chief Financial Officer at South China Morning Post Group. Previously, Eric was Chief Financial Officer at HBO (Home Box Office), and was a founding partner at the multimedia venture City On Demand.
Eric earned a B.S. from the University of Pennsylvania, and a MBA from the University of Chicago. 








 

  
 Ole Obermann 
 Chief Digital Officer & Executive Vice President, Business Development 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Ole Obermann
Chief Digital Officer & Executive Vice President, Business Development
Warner Music Group
 Ole Obermann is Chief Digital Officer and Executive Vice President, Business Development, at Warner Music Group. Ole oversees the company’s global business development strategy, with a focus on exploring new forms of commercial innovation and creating new digital revenue opportunities, while expanding WMG's streaming activities.
Ole joined WMG following a decade with Sony Music Entertainment. During his Sony tenure, he negotiated and implemented deals with Sony’s network of global digital partners. He was instrumental in Sony’s audio and video streaming strategy and oversaw the buildout of Sony’s digital analytics infrastructure. In addition, Ole spearheaded Sony’s early efforts in playlisting, including bringing playlist app FILTR to a global audience, and leading an initiative to engage with artists and managers to foster understanding, collaboration and commercial opportunity across the streaming ecosystem. Prior to joining Sony, Ole served as the Managing Director of Liquid Digital Media, a leading digital music infrastructure provider, and as a consultant for McKinsey & Co. He began his career as a product manager for BMG.
He holds a BA degree in International Relations from Colgate University and an MBA from Northwestern University’s Kellogg School of Management.








 

  
 Maria Osherova 
 Executive Vice President, Human Resources 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Maria Osherova
Executive Vice President, Human Resources
Warner Music Group
 As a member of WMG’s senior management team, Maria [Masha] Osherova oversees all aspects of WMG’s human resources functions across the globe. Her responsibilities include building a compelling and distinctive environment for WMG employees, while evolving the company’s collective skill set in alignment with its long-term creative and commercial strategy.
Masha joined WMG in 2006 as Vice President, Human Resources for Warner Music International, based in London.  Advancing to Senior Vice President of Warner Music International, she played a pivotal role in the successful integration of Parlophone Label Group within WMG. Prior to WMG, Masha was Global HR Manager for a division of Shell International Petroleum, and before that,  held several posts at The Coca-Cola Company, based variously in Copenhagen, Oslo, and St. Petersburg.
Masha studied at St. Petersburg State Polytechnical University, where she received a Master of Sciences degree.








 

  
 Paul M. Robinson 
 Executive Vice President & General Counsel 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



Paul M. Robinson
Executive Vice President & General Counsel
Warner Music Group
 Paul M. Robinson is Warner Music Group's (WMG) General Counsel, responsible for WMG's legal and public policy strategy around the world. Paul joined WMG’s legal department in 1995, and was named to his current position in 2006. Before joining WMG, Paul was a partner in the New York City law firm Mayer, Katz, Baker, Leibowitz & Roberts.
Paul has a B.A. in English from Williams College. He earned his J.D. from Fordham University School of Law.








 

  
 James Steven 
 Executive Vice President, Communications & Marketing 
 Warner Music Group 
 

nothing



James Steven
Executive Vice President, Communications & Marketing
Warner Music Group
 James Steven is Executive Vice President, Communications & Marketing, for Warner Music Group. He is responsible for WMG’s worldwide communications and corporate marketing functions, including external and internal communications, investor relations, social responsibility, and special events. He also oversees the interaction and coordination of the communications functions of WMG’s operating companies.
James joined WMG in 2007 as part of the company's international communications team based in London. He relocated to New York in 2012, becoming Senior Vice President, Communications & Marketing. Prior to WMG, James held various roles at public relations and marketing agencies, including Cow PR and Consolidated PR, working with clients in the film, TV, technology, retail, beverages, and automobile industries.








 
 
 













 































 














Recent news



  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
  Warner Music Group (WMG) has acquired selected assets from Songkick, the award-winning live music platform that attracts 15 million fans a month. The deal includes Songkick's concert discovery app and website as well as the Songkick 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
  Iconic New York Record Label Reborn During 50th Anniversary Year
Sire Records, one of the most revered and influential labels in modern music, is being reborn during its 50th anniversary year. Effective August 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
  Following on from Sarah Stennett's international award win and key note address at Midem 2017, First Access Entertainment today announced that it has signed an exclusive worldwide publishing administration agreement with Warner/Chappell Music, 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 














Contact 


Headquarters1633 BroadwayNew York, NY 10019










Submit Your Question or Comment





First Name *



Last  Name *



Email Address *

Your information will only be used for this inquiry. For more information, please read our Privacy Notice


Topic *



Questions/Comments *










Leave this field blank 





Home page 


By submitting this form, you accept the Mollom privacy policy. 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 



































Services | Warner Music Group




























Skip directly to content























 
































 









 




















 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 






 







 

























You are hereHome 
















Recorded music

 








WMG’s family of labels—including Atlantic Records Group, Warner Bros. Records Inc., and Parlophone—is among the most prominent and successful in the history of music, encompassing a global roster of acclaimed artists and an unparalleled catalog including many of the world's most popular and influential recordings.



  
 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Asylum
 Asylum has been a legendary name in the music industry for over four decades. Part of the WMG family since its inception, the label has always served as a breeding ground for compelling new artists. Today, Asylum lives under the umbrella of Atlantic Records UK, with a roster that includes Ed Sheeran, Rudimental, and Charli XCX, among others. The label was launched in 1971 by David Geffen, in partnership with Atlantic, as a haven for a groundbreaking new generation of singer/songwriters. Its early signings included Jackson Browne, the Eagles, Joni Mitchell, Linda Ronstadt, and Tom Waits.








http://atlanticrecords.co.uk/
#fabc04








 
 



 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Atlantic
 One of the most iconic and enduring labels in music history, Atlantic in its seventh decade continues to be marked by musical diversity, embracing a spectrum of chart-topping performers who span the contemporary musical landscape – including such stars as Bruno Mars, Ed Sheeran, Death Cab For Cutie, and Wiz Khalifa. Atlantic, which was founded in New York City in 1947 by music pioneers Ahmet Ertegun and Herb Abramson, started out as an independent, one-room operation dedicated to finding, recording, and promoting R&B and jazz. The duo was soon joined by a formidable production team that included Jerry Wexler, Nesuhi Ertegun, Tom Dowd, and Arif Mardin. A rarity in the industry, the Atlantic of today can trace its legacy in an unbroken line back to its very first days, its rich history distinguished by an array of legendary artists who broke new ground and set new musical standards – from Ray Charles to Led Zeppelin, from John Coltrane to Aretha Franklin, from Otis Redding to Genesis.  Today, the Atlantic Records Group encompasses the Atlantic, Asylum, Big Beat, Elektra, Fueled By Ramen, and Roadrunner labels.








http://www.atlanticrecords.com/
#ba0000








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Big Beat
 Big Beat is home to such landscape-shifting artists as Skrillex, Icona Pop, Clean Bandit, Cash Cash, Galantis, Chromeo, Martin Solveig, Knife Party, and Robin Schulz. The label was founded in 1987 by then 21-year-old New York DJ and current Chairman & CEO of Atlantic Records, Craig Kallman, who started Big Beat in his bedroom, selling records on the street from a shopping cart. Having become a major presence in the dance and hip-hop underground, Big Beat was acquired by Atlantic Records in 1991. The influential imprint was relaunched by Atlantic in 2010, again becoming a preeminent force on the leading edge of today’s dance/electronic scene.








http://wearebigbeat.com/
#000000








 
 







 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Canvasback Music
 Canvasback Music, founded in 2006 by veteran A&R executive Steve Ralbovsky, joined the Atlantic Records family in 2009. Today, its roster includes Alt-J, Grouplove, Frightened Rabbit, and the Orwells. The first Canvasback release was the acclaimed soundtrack to the film Once.








http://www.canvasbackmusic.com/
#c6b675








 
 







 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





East West
 The venerable East West name has been through several incarnations over the past six decades. In 2014, the label was relaunched as a division of Warner Music UK, and is home to a wide range of artists, among them Simply Red, Jools Holland, The Corrs, Rumer, and Beverly Knight. East West was originally formed in 1957 as a subsidiary of Atlantic, with a roster that included artists such as the Kingsmen (members of Bill Haley’s Comets), Jay Holliday, Johnny Houston, and the Glowtones. After being dormant for nearly thirty years, the label was revived as a jazz imprint by legendary Atlantic executive Nesuhi Ertegun, who produced several notable recordings for the label before his untimely passing in 1989. The following year, it returned as a genre-spanning label featuring En Vogue, Pantera, Gerald Levert, Missy Elliott, and others. The East West of today remains distinguished by artistic diversity, selectivity, and excellence.








http://www.eastwestrecords.co.uk/
#000000








 
 






 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Elektra
 The famed Elektra label was reignited in 2009, its independent spirit alive and well in the music of Fitz and the Tantrums, Saint Motel, The Moth & The Flame, Fences, Kaleo, Anderson East, and others. Founded in 1950 by music visionary Jac Holzman, Elektra Records is one of the most influential and revered labels in the business, from its origins in traditional folk and ethnic music to launching the careers of such seminal artists as Judy Collins, the Doors, and the Stooges. Defined since its inception by an artist-driven environment, the label has championed a boundary-crossing roster, from the Eagles to Metallica, from Natalie Cole to Missy Elliott. In 2004, with the new independence of Warner Music Group following its sale by Time Warner, Elektra was merged into the Atlantic Records Group.








http://www.elektra.com/
#cc9832








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Erato
 Erato was established in Paris in 1953 with a founding mission to focus on recording French composers and artists, with an emphasis on Renaissance and Baroque music. Over the years, the Erato catalog grew to feature such noted artists as Plácido Domingo, Maxim Vengerov, Daniel Barenboim, Pierre Boulez, Maurice André, Hélène Grimaud, Scott Ross, Marie-Claire Alain, Jean-Pierre Rampal, Susan Graham, and José van Dam. Erato joined the WMG family in 1992. In 2013, Erato was relaunched when the Virgin Classics label became part of WMG through Warner’s acquisition of Parlophone Label Group. Today, Erato records such acclaimed artists as Natalie Dessay, Philippe Jaroussky, Joyce DiDonato, Diana Damrau, the Ébène Quartet, Renaud Capuçon, Gautier Capuçon, and Alexandre Tharaud.








http://www.warnerclassics.com/
#009036








 
 







 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





FFRR
 FFRR is a celebrated dance music label originally established in 1986 by legendary English DJ, A&R executive and electronic music pioneer Pete Tong. In 2011, FFRR was relaunched under Warner Music UK and today is a dance imprint for Parlophone, with Tong at the helm of A&R for the label. The label’s roster includes Paper Crows, Blonde, Oliver Heldens, Disciples, and Icarus. The original incarnation of FFRR featured releases from such groundbreaking artists as Orbital, The Brand New Heavies, Shakespear’s Sister, Salt ‘N’ Pepa, Lil Louis, LTJ Bukem, All Saints, Jay-Z, Smith & Mighty, Armand Van Helden, Carl Cox, and Tong himself. The name FFRR originally stood for Full Frequency Range Recording, an improved high-fidelity recording technique.








http://www.ffrrecords.com/
#000000








 
 






 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Fueled By Ramen
 Since its official inception nearly two decades ago, Fueled By Ramen Records has been more than just a record label; it has been a brand for the ever-growing community that has embraced what the label stands for. The label has become the nucleus for today’s best and brightest punk-inspired rock/pop bands, with a roster that includes the likes of Paramore, fun., Panic! At The Disco, and twenty one pilots. Originally based in the college town of Gainesville, Florida – where it was headquartered in label founder John Janick’s dorm room – Fueled By Ramen now calls New York City home.








http://www.fueledbyramen.com/
#3fcfc9








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Nonesuch
 Artistry. Originality. Diversity. Quality. In 2014, Nonesuch Records celebrated its 50th anniversary, a landmark in the history of a label whose eclectic, award-winning roster today ranges from The Black Keys to Kronos Quartet, Emmylou Harris to John Adams, Brad Mehldau to Randy Newman, Chris Thile to Rhiannon Giddens, Steve Reich to Robert Plant, Caetano Veloso to Audra McDonald. Founded as a budget classical label in 1964 by Jac Holzman, head of the then-independent Elektra Records, and overseen by Bob Hurwitz for the past three decades, Nonesuch Records pursues a broad mission that embraces world music, classical, jazz, folk, rock, bluegrass, Americana, musical theater, soundtracks, and often the uncategorizable.








http://www.nonesuch.com/
#7e6d5a








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Parlophone
 With more than a century of experience in discovering and nurturing iconic recording artists, Parlophone is among the most famous and prestigious companies in the history of the music industry. The London-based PLG (Parlophone Label Group) joined Warner Music Group in 2013, bringing to the WMG family such artists as Coldplay, David Guetta, Lily Allen, Kylie Minogue, Damon Albarn, and the world-renowned EMI Classics label. Originally founded in Germany in 1896, with its British arm established in 1923, the Parlophone catalog includes such groundbreaking artists as Pink Floyd, David Bowie, Radiohead, Jethro Tull, Kate Bush, and many more. PLG is also home to FFRR, the dance music label formed by English DJ Pete Tong in 1986.








http://www.parlophone.co.uk/
#600a87








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Reprise 
 Established in 1960, Reprise Records is now an imprint under the Warner Bros. Records (WBR) umbrella, home to a diverse array of artists, including Neil Young, Tom Petty, Green Day, Michael Bublé, Josh Groban, and others. They join an illustrious Reprise history that has included the likes of Jimi Hendrix, Joni Mitchell, Fleetwood Mac, Eric Clapton, and Randy Newman. Originally formed by Frank Sinatra as a label that would give artists freedom and creative control, the early Reprise roster also included fellow Rat Pack members Dean Martin and Sammy Davis, Jr., among others. Warner Bros. acquired Reprise in 1963 and the label soon expanded into the worlds of rock and pop music.  With Reprise came Mo Ostin, the inspirational executive who would guide both Reprise and WBR for three decades.








http://www.warnerbrosrecords.com/
#cf8106








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Rhino
 Warner Music Group is home to one of the most extraordinary, timeless bodies of work in music history, spanning decades of cultural history and virtually every genre. As the keeper of the company’s rich legacy, Rhino Entertainment develops and promotes this collection across multiple media platforms. Established in 1978, Rhino evolved into the world’s premier reissue label, setting the standard for excellence in both the physical and digital worlds. Rhino has also expanded the definition of what a catalog music company can be, inking groundbreaking partnerships with legendary artists such as the Grateful Dead and Frank Sinatra. Rhino was first associated with Warner Music Group in 1992 through a distribution pact with Atlantic Records, and in 1998 it became a wholly owned division of WMG.








http://www.rhino.com/
#d51b3b








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Roadrunner Records
 The name Roadrunner has defined authentic, no-compromise hard rock and metal music for over three decades. The Roadrunner roster of today boasts an impressively diverse array of artists, among them Slipknot, Rush, Theory of a Deadman, Killswitch Engage, Stone Sour, Dream Theater, Amity Affliction, and Trivium. Roadrunner’s roots stretch back to 1980, when the company started out as an independent Dutch importer of heavy metal albums. Roadrunner soon began discovering and signing bands of its own, opening an office in New York City in 1986 and later bringing the world such top-charting artists as Nickelback. In 2007, Warner Music Group acquired a majority stake in Roadrunner and three years later the company became a wholly owned division of WMG.








http://www.roadrunnerrecords.com/
#ee333e








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Sire
 2016 will mark the 50th anniversary of Sire Records.  Since its founding by industry legend Seymour Stein – who remains at the helm – and Richard Gotterher, Sire has lived at the cutting edge of modern music.  The Sire vision continues today with Delta Rae, Ben Fields, Residual Kid, Cold Fronts, and others. In 1976, ten years after its formation, Sire joined the Warner Music Group family and quickly became a pioneering force on the emerging punk and new wave scene, signing such groundbreaking artists as the Ramones and Talking Heads. The Sire roster expanded to include culture-shifting performers such as Madonna, the Smiths, the Pretenders, Depeche Mode, the Cult, the Replacements, and dozens more.








http://www.warnerbrosrecords.com/
#d7c42e








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Warner Bros. Records
 Warner Bros. Records (WBR) has stood as a beacon of artistic freedom and creative expression for the past six decades, releasing some of the most culturally influential and innovative music of our time. Based in Burbank, California, the WBR label is home to an impressive generation of artists, among them Avenged Sevenfold, Gary Clark Jr., Jason Derulo, Echosmith, The Flaming Lips, Jenny Lewis, Linkin Park, Muse, Nico & Vinz, Prince, Red Hot Chili Peppers, Royal Blood, and many others. Beginning in 1958 as the label arm of the famed movie studio, things began to take shape in the early ‘60s with artists like the Everly Brothers, Peter Paul & Mary, and comedian Bob Newhart. With the acquisition of Frank Sinatra’s Reprise Records in 1963, the WBR mantra of “the music first” took hold, leading to the signing of such groundbreaking artists as the Kinks, Grateful Dead, Van Morrison, James Taylor, Rod Stewart, Black Sabbath, Van Halen, and many more.








http://www.warnerbrosrecords.com/
#000000








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Warner Classics
 Based in Paris, Warner Classics and its sister label Erato together comprise one of the world’s leading global classical music recording companies. In 2013, with WMG’s acquisition of Parlophone Label Group, the renowned EMI Classics roster and catalog became part of Warner Classics. The label exclusively records such acclaimed artists as Alison Balsom, Emmanuel Pahud, Sir Antonio Pappano, and distinguished organizations like the Orchestra dell’Accademia Nazionale di Santa Cecilia. The company boasts an unrivaled catalogue of recordings by international superstars Nigel Kennedy, Kiri Te Kanawa, Itzhak Perlman, Sir Simon Rattle, André Previn, and Riccardo Muti, and the historic recordings of Mstislav Rostropovich, Maria Callas, Victoria de los Angeles, Dame Elisabeth Schwarzkopf, Jacqueline du Pré, Herbert von Karajan, Otto Klemperer, Sir Adrian Boult, and Sir John Barbirolli, as well as the longest-serving artist in the history of the record industry, violinist and conductor Yehudi Menuhin.








http://www.warnerclassics.com/
#0061aa








 
 








 

 
 
 
 
 


 
 





Warner Music Nashville
 Blake Shelton, Hunter Hayes, Brett Eldredge, Cole Swindell, Frankie Ballard, Dan + Shay, Ashley Monroe, Randy Travis – these are just a few of the artists who call Warner Music Nashville home. The country music wing of WMG, Warner Music Nashville was formally established in 2009, but its roots run deep in the long history of the individual WMG labels in Music City – including seminal recordings by Willie Nelson, Emmylou Harris, Gram Parsons, Rodney Crowell, Travis Tritt, Hank Williams Jr., Eddie Rabbitt, LeAnn Rimes, and others. Warner Music Nashville is the country umbrella for Atlantic Records, Warner Bros. Records, and Elektra Nashville.








http://www.warnermusicnashville.com/
#2d200f








 
 








 
 
 








Artist & Label Services




For more than four decades, WMG has been an industry-leading force in providing a world-class array of services designed to help artists and labels grow their careers and their businesses. Artist & Label Services is the umbrella for WEA (Warner-Elektra-Atlantic) – the pioneering WEA distribution and marketing network – and Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) – the groundbreaking global distribution company for independent artists and labels.
 

  
 

 
 
 


 
 









 
  ADA is a worldwide service organization committed to independent artist and label development. As part of Warner Music Group, ADA gives the indie community access to an unparalleled global distribution system and a dedicated team that provides a complete spectrum of marketing, merchandising, promotion, and music licensing services.  ADA was created in 1993 to focus on the independent music business, where some of the most successful artists and record labels have built their initial followings. ADA marries the effectiveness and convenience of a major label with the marketing sensibilities of an independent. ADA’s partners include Alligator, Bar None, Beggars Group, Comedy Central, Domino, Epitaph, Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, Matador, Merge, Mute, Nettwerk, New West, Real World, Rise, Smithsonian Folkways, Sumerian, Sub Pop, Tommy Boy, Vice, and many others.
 
 





ADA
 ADA is a worldwide service organization committed to independent artist and label development. As part of Warner Music Group, ADA gives the indie community access to an unparalleled global distribution system and a dedicated team that provides a complete spectrum of marketing, merchandising, promotion, and music licensing services.  ADA was created in 1993 to focus on the independent music business, where some of the most successful artists and record labels have built their initial followings. ADA marries the effectiveness and convenience of a major label with the marketing sensibilities of an independent. ADA’s partners include Alligator, Bar None, Beggars Group, Comedy Central, Domino, Epitaph, Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, Matador, Merge, Mute, Nettwerk, New West, Real World, Rise, Smithsonian Folkways, Sumerian, Sub Pop, Tommy Boy, Vice, and many others.








http://www.ada-music.com/
#c92932







 

 

 
 
 


 
 









 
  When WEA celebrated its 25th anniversary in 1996, Billboard magazine stated that the company had “forged a new era of distribution and delivery that would provide the new music an unparalleled global reach,” noting that it had created “a worldwide network with a local focus” and “whole new categories of sales and service.” These words hold true two decades later, as WEA continues to set the standard for sales and marketing in the 21st century. When WEA was formed in 1971, it brought together three visionary record labels – Warner Bros., Elektra, and Atlantic – to form a musical powerhouse that changed the face of the modern music business. The WEA of today has transformed itself from a traditional manufacturing and distribution division into a company that provides distribution, marketing, and research services for all of WMG’s labels across an array of physical and digital platforms, as well as working with a number of third-party film, broadcast, and video game companies.
Warner Music Artist Services is the division of WEA that combines its expansive range of ancillary rights operations under one roof. Powered by a team of experts in everything from tour and VIP execution to consumer analytics and web development, Warner Music Artist Services is uniquely positioned to evolve what it means to run an integrated artist branding campaign. With a comprehensive suite of services covering all direct-to-fan and merchandise capabilities, the division is built to move fast and experiment more in a constantly shifting music industry that rewards those who lead by example.
 
 





WEA
 When WEA celebrated its 25th anniversary in 1996, Billboard magazine stated that the company had “forged a new era of distribution and delivery that would provide the new music an unparalleled global reach,” noting that it had created “a worldwide network with a local focus” and “whole new categories of sales and service.” These words hold true two decades later, as WEA continues to set the standard for sales and marketing in the 21st century. When WEA was formed in 1971, it brought together three visionary record labels – Warner Bros., Elektra, and Atlantic – to form a musical powerhouse that changed the face of the modern music business. The WEA of today has transformed itself from a traditional manufacturing and distribution division into a company that provides distribution, marketing, and research services for all of WMG’s labels across an array of physical and digital platforms, as well as working with a number of third-party film, broadcast, and video game companies.
Warner Music Artist Services is the division of WEA that combines its expansive range of ancillary rights operations under one roof. Powered by a team of experts in everything from tour and VIP execution to consumer analytics and web development, Warner Music Artist Services is uniquely positioned to evolve what it means to run an integrated artist branding campaign. With a comprehensive suite of services covering all direct-to-fan and merchandise capabilities, the division is built to move fast and experiment more in a constantly shifting music industry that rewards those who lead by example.








http://www.wmgartistservices.com/
#0061aa







 
 
 








Publishing




Warner/Chappell Music, the global music publishing company of WMG, is home to an extraordinary catalog that includes timeless standards and contemporary hits, representing works by over 65,000 songwriters and composers, with a collection of more than one million copyrights. Warner/Chappell also includes Warner/Chappell Production Music.
 

  
 

 
 
 


 
 









 
 





Warner/Chappell Music
 Warner/Chappell Music (WCM) can trace its history back more than 200 years, to the founding of Chappell & Company on London’s Bond Street in 1811. Since then, the company has been committed to discovering and supporting the greatest songwriters and composers across every musical era and genre. WCM provides deep expertise spanning a range of creative services and innovative opportunities for composers and copyright holders.  The company publishes and administers music from Steve Aoki, Beyoncé, Blur, Eric Clapton, Alice Cooper, The Dream, Gamble & Huff, Barry Gibb, Ashley Gorley, Green Day, JAY Z, Kendrick Lamar, Led Zeppelin, Little Big Town, Lukas Graham, Madonna, George Michael, Julia Michaels, Lin Manuel Miranda, Katy Perry, Radiohead, Rihanna, Roc Nation, Slash, Stephen Sondheim, Chris Stapleton, Rod Temperton, Tove Lo, Justin Tranter, Twenty One Pilots, and Pharrell Williams, among many others. With offices in more than 40 countries, the WCM of today was formally established with the purchase of Chappell by Warner Bros. Music in 1987.








http://www.warnerchappell.com/
#0061aa







 

 

 
 
 


 
 








 
 





Warner/Chappell Production Music
 Warner/Chappell Production Music is a global leader in the production music industry, with over 35 years of experience and success. It encompasses more than 90 catalogs worldwide and unites many of the most successful and respected independent brands in production music, including Frank Gari Productions and Gari Communications, 615 Music, Non-Stop Music, Groove Addicts, V – The Production Library, Full Tilt, and many others. Warner/Chappell Production Music has been the recipient of many industry awards, including multiple Emmy®, Telly, ADDY, and Promax honors, and its composers have created works for countless well-known TV shows, movies, and companies. The division was officially established in 2012, when all of WMG’s production music houses were officially united under the Warner/Chappell Production Music umbrella.








http://www.warnerchappellpm.com/
#fb9618







 
 
 








 




 


 

































  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 









 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 



































News | Warner Music Group




























Skip directly to content























 
































 









 




















 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 






 







 

























You are hereHome 


















News

 







  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 Songkick’s discovery app and website to operate as part of WEA, WMG's artist and label services division 
 Read more 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 Iconic New York Record Label Reborn During 50th Anniversary Year
Sire Records, one of the most revered and influential labels in modern music, is being reborn during its 50th anniversary year. Effective August 1, widely respected A&R executive... 
 Read more 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 Following on from Sarah Stennett's international award win and key note address at Midem 2017, First Access Entertainment today announced that it has signed an exclusive worldwide publishing administration agreement with Warner/Chappell Music, the... 
 Read more 

 June 13, 2017 
 Warner Music France President Thierry Chassagne Honored as Knight of the National Order of Merit 
 Thierry Chassagne, President of Warner Music France, yesterday was appointed Chevalier de l’Ordre National du Mérite – a Knight of France’s prestigious National Order of Merit. 
 Read more 

 June 08, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Bolsters Business Development Leadership 
 Jeff Bronikowski Joins as SVP, Global Business Development/Head of New Technology & Innovation; Tracy Gardner Promoted to SVP, Global Business Development and Strategy 
 Read more 

 June 07, 2017 
 Laura Pausini Signs New Deal With Warner Music Italy 
 Laura Pausini, the biggest female Italian pop music artist, has renewed her worldwide deal with Warner Music Italy.
Laura Pausini says: “Warner was the one who first believed in me 24 years ago and I still bet on our chemistry.”
Marco Alboni, CEO,... 
 Read more 

 June 06, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Establishes New Arts Division 
 Division Will Be Umbrella for Warner Classics, Musical Theatre, Jazz, Children’s Music, Film Scores & More; Respected Industry Executive Kevin Gore Appointed President; Joint Venture Launched with Sh-K-Boom/Ghostlight Records 
 Read more 

 May 23, 2017 
 Kurt Deutsch Named SVP, Theatrical & Catalog Development for Warner/Chappell Music 
 Sh-K-Boom/Ghostlight Records President & Grammy-Winning Producer Joins Global Music Publishing Team 
 Read more 

 May 18, 2017 
 Skepta Wins Songwriter of the Year and Best Contemporary Song at The Ivor Novello Awards 
 Michael Kiwanuka wins Best Song Musically & Lyrically and Dario Marianelli wins Best Original Film Score 
 Read more 

 May 11, 2017 
 Warner Music UK Appoints Chris Bovill and John Allison to Lead the Firepit’s Original Content Studio & Brian Murnin Named as Senior Vice President, Business Development, The Firepit 
 Warner Music UK today unveiled the leadership team for The Firepit, the company’s original creative content and production studio. 
Award-winning creative team Chris Bovill and John Allison will be responsible for developing visual formats and... 
 Read more 

 May 10, 2017 
 Warner/Chappell Music Named BMI Publisher of the Year; Justin Tranter, Ross Golan Win Songwriter of the Year 
  Warner/Chappell Songwriters Earn 17 Song Awards 
 Read more 

 May 08, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Corp. Reports Results for Fiscal Second Quarter Ended March 31, 2017 
 Total revenue grew 10.7% or was up 12.7% in constant currency; Digital revenue grew 21.9% or was up 23.3% in constant currency; Net income was $20 million versus $12 million in the prior-year quarter; OIBDA was $141 million versus $127 million in... 
 Read more 
 


 



















 


 








 




 


 































 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 

























Axis | Login

















































                                                      	Remember Me
                 									

Register | 
                 										Forgot Password





















© 2017 Warner Elektra Atlantic Corporation | Terms of Use | Privacy Policy



























Warner Music Group | WMG




























Skip directly to content























 































 










 









 









 




















 








Homepage Video



 

  
  
 WMG Intro 
  
 http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/340485632/340485632_4817584351001_4817566088001.mp4 
  
  

 http://www.beberexha.com/ 
 Bebe Rexha - I Got You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2685/301939184_5386109686001_5386083529001.mp4 
  
 Bebe Rexha 
 I Got You 

 http://www.twentyonepilots.com/ 
 Twenty One Pilots - Heathens 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166896968001_5166880568001.mp4 
  
 Twenty One Pilots 
 Heathens 

 http://www.garyclarkjr.com/ 
 Gary Clark Jr. - The Healing 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/645/301939184_5386110933001_5386082540001.mp4 
  
 Gary Clark Jr.  
 The Healing 

 http://www.brunomars.com 
 Bruno Mars - That's What I Like 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2595/301939184_5386109697001_5386085565001.mp4 
  
 Bruno Mars 
 That's What I Like 

 http://cleanbandit.co.uk/ 
 Clean Bandit - Rockabye 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/1645/301939184_5386109909001_5386082539001.mp4 
  
 Clean Bandit 
 Rockabye 

 http://www.ledzeppelin.com/ 
 Led Zeppelin - Whole Lotta Love 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443837830001_4443781701001.mp4 
  
 Led Zeppelin 
 Whole Lotta Love 

 http://www.greenday.com 
 Green Day - Bang Bang 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166810316001_5166783632001.mp4 
  
 Green Day 
 Bang Bang 

 https://www.thedoors.com/ 
 The Doors - Break On Through (To The Other Side) 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443848605001_4443809358001.mp4 
  
 The Doors 
 Break On Through (To The Other Side) 

 http://www.edsheeran.com/ 
 Ed Sheeran - Shape of You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/3859/301939184_5386109614001_5386088907001.mp4 
  
 Ed Sheeran 
 Shape of You 
 




 
 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 












Recorded Music
Recorded MusicWMG’s family of labels—including Atlantic Records Group, Warner Bros. Records Inc., and Parlophone—is among the most prominent and successful in the history of music, encompassing a global roster of acclaimed artists and an unparalleled catalog including many of the world's most popular and influential recordings.
      		
      	



Publishing
PublishingWarner/Chappell Music, the global music publishing company of WMG, is home to an extraordinary catalog that includes timeless standards and contemporary hits, representing works by over 65,000 songwriters and composers, with a collection of more than one million copyrights. Warner/Chappell also includes Warner/Chappell Production Music.

      		



Artist Services
 Artist ServicesFor more than four decades, WMG has been an industry-leading force in providing a world-class array of services designed to help artists and labels grow their careers and their businesses. Artist & Label Services is the umbrella for WEA (Warner-Elektra-Atlantic) – the pioneering WEA distribution and marketing network – and Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) – the groundbreaking global distribution company for independent artists and labels.

      		



Culture
CultureWMG embraces a unique collection of world-renowned companies with distinct cultures, while embodying one unifying principle: it’s all about the music. The people of WMG are driven by a creative, independent spirit that stems from the company’s deep history in nurturing entrepreneurial thinking and artist-focused innovation.

      		



News



Careers

 






 




















 














 




























home onepage b

 





















 




 


 

































  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 









 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 




































Warner Music Group | WMG




























Skip directly to content























 































 










 









 









 




















 








Homepage Video



 

  
  
 WMG Intro 
  
 http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/340485632/340485632_4817584351001_4817566088001.mp4 
  
  

 http://www.beberexha.com/ 
 Bebe Rexha - I Got You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2685/301939184_5386109686001_5386083529001.mp4 
  
 Bebe Rexha 
 I Got You 

 http://www.twentyonepilots.com/ 
 Twenty One Pilots - Heathens 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166896968001_5166880568001.mp4 
  
 Twenty One Pilots 
 Heathens 

 http://www.garyclarkjr.com/ 
 Gary Clark Jr. - The Healing 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/645/301939184_5386110933001_5386082540001.mp4 
  
 Gary Clark Jr.  
 The Healing 

 http://www.brunomars.com 
 Bruno Mars - That's What I Like 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2595/301939184_5386109697001_5386085565001.mp4 
  
 Bruno Mars 
 That's What I Like 

 http://cleanbandit.co.uk/ 
 Clean Bandit - Rockabye 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/1645/301939184_5386109909001_5386082539001.mp4 
  
 Clean Bandit 
 Rockabye 

 http://www.ledzeppelin.com/ 
 Led Zeppelin - Whole Lotta Love 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443837830001_4443781701001.mp4 
  
 Led Zeppelin 
 Whole Lotta Love 

 http://www.greenday.com 
 Green Day - Bang Bang 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166810316001_5166783632001.mp4 
  
 Green Day 
 Bang Bang 

 https://www.thedoors.com/ 
 The Doors - Break On Through (To The Other Side) 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443848605001_4443809358001.mp4 
  
 The Doors 
 Break On Through (To The Other Side) 

 http://www.edsheeran.com/ 
 Ed Sheeran - Shape of You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/3859/301939184_5386109614001_5386088907001.mp4 
  
 Ed Sheeran 
 Shape of You 
 




 
 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 












Recorded Music
Recorded MusicWMG’s family of labels—including Atlantic Records Group, Warner Bros. Records Inc., and Parlophone—is among the most prominent and successful in the history of music, encompassing a global roster of acclaimed artists and an unparalleled catalog including many of the world's most popular and influential recordings.
      		
      	



Publishing
PublishingWarner/Chappell Music, the global music publishing company of WMG, is home to an extraordinary catalog that includes timeless standards and contemporary hits, representing works by over 65,000 songwriters and composers, with a collection of more than one million copyrights. Warner/Chappell also includes Warner/Chappell Production Music.

      		



Artist Services
 Artist ServicesFor more than four decades, WMG has been an industry-leading force in providing a world-class array of services designed to help artists and labels grow their careers and their businesses. Artist & Label Services is the umbrella for WEA (Warner-Elektra-Atlantic) – the pioneering WEA distribution and marketing network – and Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) – the groundbreaking global distribution company for independent artists and labels.

      		



Culture
CultureWMG embraces a unique collection of world-renowned companies with distinct cultures, while embodying one unifying principle: it’s all about the music. The people of WMG are driven by a creative, independent spirit that stems from the company’s deep history in nurturing entrepreneurial thinking and artist-focused innovation.

      		



News



Careers

 






 




















 














 




























home onepage b

 





















 




 


 

































  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 









 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 




























Warner Music Group Corp. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review























































  info@wiseguyreports.com  |   
 Chat with us   |    +1 (339) 368 6938 (US)  |     +44 208 133 9349 (UK) 



 Login    Register 






















Home


Report Categories







Premium Reports

Access to 600000+ Premium Reports











  
                                Aerospace & Defense
                              









  
                                Agri & Food
                              









  
                                Automotive
                              









  
                                Basic Materials
                              











  
                                Consumer Goods & Retail
                              









  
                                Energy
                              









  
                                Life Sciences
                              









  
                                Manufacturing & Construction
                              











  
                                Services
                              









  
                                Telecom & IT
                              









  
                                Education
                              









  
                                Security & Intelligence Systems
                              











  
                                Technology
                              









  
                                Company Reports
                              










Report Categories 










Aerospace & Defense
                





Agri & Food
                





Automotive
                





Basic Materials
                







Consumer Goods & Retail
                





Energy
                





Life Sciences
                





Manufacturing & Construction
                







Services
                





Telecom & IT
                





Education
                





Security & Intelligence Systems
                







Technology
                





Company Reports
                








Publisher
Knowledgestore

Countries 
              


Browse by Country
Browse by Continent
Browse by Group / Region



 Conferences
              


Upcoming Conferences
Seminars




 Conferences
              


Upcoming Conferences
Seminars




Countries 

Browse by Country
Browse by Continent
Browse by Group / Region



News & Blog

 Press Release
Blog



News & Blogs

 Press Release
Blogs


FAQs

About Us

About Our Company
Our Team
Life At WGR


Careers
Contact Us











                                         There are no items currently in your basket.
                                     













There are no items currently in your basket!














  




































Search 
                






 














Home
All Reports
Warner Music Group Corp. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review









 


  Warner Music Group Corp. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review


WGR26024
9 
                  January, 2017 
Global
23 pages 
GlobalData






















Description




Table of Content




Sample Report




Enquiry before buy




Related Reports





Warner Music Group Corp. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company’s history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company’s key employees, key competitors and major products and services.
This up-to-the-minute company report will help you to formulate strategies to drive your business by enabling you to understand your partners, customers and competitors better.
Scope
- Business description – A detailed description of the company’s operations and business divisions.
- Corporate strategy – GlobalData’s summarization of the company’s business strategy.
- SWOT analysis – A detailed analysis of the company’s strengths, weakness, opportunities and threats.
- Company history – Progression of key events associated with the company.
- Major products and services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.
- Key competitors – A list of key competitors to the company.
- Key employees – A list of the key executives of the company.
- Executive biographies – A brief summary of the executives’ employment history.
- Key operational heads – A list of personnel heading key departments/functions.
- Important locations and subsidiaries – A list of key locations and subsidiaries of the company, including contact details.
Highlights
Warner Music Group Corp. (WMG) is one of the world’s leading music-based content companies. It specializes in music recording and music publishing business. The company markets, distributes and licenses recorded music produced by artists in various physical formats such as CDs, vinyl and DVDs and digital formats such as streaming and downloads. WMG markets and sells recorded music through multiple channel including music specialty stores, general entertainment specialty stores, supermarkets, independent retailers and Internet, among others. The company owns and acquires rights to musical compositions, exploits and markets these compositions, and receives royalties or fees for their use. It operates through international affiliates and licensees around the world. WMG is headquartered in New York, the US.
Reasons to Buy
- Gain key insights into the company for academic or business research purposes. Key elements such as SWOT analysis and corporate strategy are incorporated in the profile to assist your academic or business research needs.
- Identify potential customers and suppliers with this report’s analysis of the company’s business structure, operations, major products and services and business strategy.
- Understand and respond to your competitors’ business structure and strategies with GlobalData’s detailed SWOT analysis. In this, the company’s core strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats are analyzed, providing you with an up to date objective view of the company.
- Examine potential investment and acquisition targets with this report’s detailed insight into the company’s strategic, business and operational performance.
Note: Some sections may be missing if data is unavailable for the company.


Table of Contents  
Table of Contents  2
List of Tables  3
Section 1 - About the Company  4
Warner Music Group Corp. - Key Facts  4
Warner Music Group Corp. - Key Employees  5
Warner Music Group Corp. - Key Employee Biographies  6
Warner Music Group Corp. - Major Products and Services  8
Warner Music Group Corp. - History  9
Warner Music Group Corp. - Company Statement  12
Warner Music Group Corp. - Locations And Subsidiaries  14
Head Office  14
Other Locations & Subsidiaries  14
Section 2 – Company Analysis  16
Warner Music Group Corp. - Business Description  16
Warner Music Group Corp. - Corporate Strategy  17
Warner Music Group Corp. - SWOT Analysis  18
SWOT Analysis - Overview  18
Warner Music Group Corp. - Strengths  18
Warner Music Group Corp. - Weaknesses  19
Warner Music Group Corp. - Opportunities  20
Warner Music Group Corp. - Threats  21
Warner Music Group Corp. - Key Competitors  22
Section 3 – Appendix  23
Methodology  23
About GlobalData  23
Contact Us  23
Disclaimer  23
List of Tables  
Warner Music Group Corp., Key Facts  4
Warner Music Group Corp., Key Employees  5
Warner Music Group Corp., Key Employee Biographies  6
Warner Music Group Corp., Major Products and Services  8
Warner Music Group Corp., History  9
Warner Music Group Corp., Subsidiaries  14
Warner Music Group Corp., Key Competitors  22







                                Request a Sample Report
                                




Name:*










Email:*


(Optional: Request you to please fill in your Corporate Email-ID)



Job Title:*





Company:*





Phone No:*





Your Country:*

--select country--
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodja
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo-Brazzaville
Congo-Kinshasa
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d"Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland (Malvinas)
Faroes
Fiji
Finland
France
French-Guiana
Tahiti(French Polinesia)
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Vatican City
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macao
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Norfolk
Northern Mariana
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
St Vincent & the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands British
Virgin Islands US
Wales
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Timor-Leste
Curacao
St Kitts & Nevis
Sint Maarten
Guernsey
Isle of Man
Jersey
Niue
Montenegro



Do you have any Specific field of Interest?*

















Confirm


 








Make an enquiry before buying this Report




Name:*










Email:*


(Optional: Request you to please fill in your Corporate Email-ID)



Job Title:*





Company:*





Phone No:*





Your Country:*

--select country--
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia & Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodja
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo-Brazzaville
Congo-Kinshasa
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d"Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland (Malvinas)
Faroes
Fiji
Finland
France
French-Guiana
Tahiti(French Polinesia)
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Vatican City
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
North Korea
South Korea
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macao
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Norfolk
Northern Mariana
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
St Vincent & the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome & Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad & Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands British
Virgin Islands US
Wales
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Timor-Leste
Curacao
St Kitts & Nevis
Sint Maarten
Guernsey
Isle of Man
Jersey
Niue
Montenegro



Your Enquiry*

















Confirm


 







 Global Cruising Sailing Super-Yachts Market Research Report 2017

                      In this report, the global Cruising Sailing Super-Yachts market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016...
                      


 Global Tennis Market Research Report 2011-2023

                      Summary
Tennis Racquet is a sports implement consisting of a handled frame with an open hoop across which a network of strings or catgut is stretched tightly. It is used for striking tennis in game...
                      


 Global Recorded Music Market Size, Status and Forecast 2022

                      This report studies the global Recorded Music market, analyzes and researches the Recorded Music development status and forecast in United States, EU, Japan, China, India and Southeast Asia. This r...
                      


 2017-2022 Baby Play Gyms Report on Global and United States Market, Status and Forecast, by Players, Types and Applications


                      This report studies the Baby Play Gyms market status and outlook of global and United States, from angles of players, regions, product types and end industries; this report analyzes the top players...
                      


 Global Digital Marketing Market Size, Status and Forecast 2022

                      This report studies the Digital Marketing market status and outlook of global and major regions, from angles of players, regions, product and end Application/industries; this report analyzes the to...
                      











Purchase this Market Research Report







 USD




 GBP




 EURO




 YEN




 INR







                        1-user PDF
                         
                          $125.00
                        

 
                        Site PDF 
                         
                          $250.00
                        

 
                        Enterprise PDF 
                         
                          $375.00
                        





  1-user PDF
  
 
    96.06
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  192.13
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  288.19
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    107.33
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  214.65
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  321.98
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    13,852.25
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  27,704.50
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  41,556.75
  





  1-user PDF
  
 
    8,052.50
   

 
  Site PDF 
  
 
  16,105.00
  

 
  Enterprise PDF 
  
 
  24,157.50
  









Add To Cart
BUY NOW





 















  Email Report


  Sample Report




  Save Page


  Any Questions




  Download information


  Check Discount




  Download Order Form









  Email Report


  Sample Report




  Save Page


  Any Questions




  Download information


  Check Discount




  Download Order Form






Contact Us










Akash Anand
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+1 (646) 843 9312 (US)
+44 208 133 9349 (UK)













Rishabh Arora
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+44-208-133-9346













Abu Koshy
Domain Head Business Development
sales@wiseguyreports.com
+1 339 368 6938










Related Reports







Global Cruising Sailing Super-Yachts Market Research Report 2017
                      
                      Published: 12 
                        July, 2017
                    








Global Tennis Market Research Report 2011-2023
                      
                      Published: 7 
                        July, 2017
                    








Global Recorded Music Market Size, Status and Forecast 2022
                      
                      Published: 6 
                        July, 2017
                    








2017-2022 Baby Play Gyms Report on Global and United States Market, Status and Forecast, by Players, Types and Applications

                      
                      Published: 6 
                        July, 2017
                    








Global Digital Marketing Market Size, Status and Forecast 2022
                      
                      Published: 7 
                        June, 2017
                    









                  ×
              
Tell a friend about this report 




Your Name:*





Your Email:*





Friend's Name:*





Friend's Email:*





Your Enquiry*









Send


 



































Warner Music Group Corp. Executives, Organizational Chart, Company Profile Information, Contacts | Headquarters, Locations, News   












Submit

ContactCareersLogin

MENUtoggle
Our Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions [Column]  ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention  [Column]  Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation  [Column]  Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & Ranking Knowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News Pricing

Menu

HomeOur Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & RankingKnowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News PricingGet a Free ProfileSchedule a DemoRequest PricingContact UsLogin
Home / Companies / Warner Music Group Corp.


Warner Music Group Corp.

75 Rockefeller Plaza 
New York NY 10019 United States
Phone: +1 212-___-____
Fax: +1 212-___-____
http://www.wmg.com





69
Managers




316
IT employees




$117.3MEST.
IT Budget




Warner Music Group Corp. is a music content company.{BR}{BR}It owns a number of record labels in the US and overseas, and also includes Warner/Chappell Music Group, a music publishing subsidiary. The company was bought by Access Industries in 2011.
Warner Music Group Corp. is a music content company.

It owns a number of record labels in the US and overseas, and also includes Warner/Chappell Music Group, a music publishing subsidiary. The company was bought by Access Industries in 2011.

IT at… MoreWarner Music Group Corp. is a music content company.

It owns a number of record labels in the US and overseas, and also includes Warner/Chappell Music Group, a music publishing subsidiary. The company was bought by Access Industries in 2011.

IT at Warner Music Group Corporation is evenly split between the New York, NY headquarters and the company's Burbank, CA location. IT staff are present at other company locations, such as in Nashville, TN, Los Angeles, CA and Miami Beach, FL. The Global IT Services group maintains the company's infrastructure, and includes Networks and telecommunications functions, as well as Enterprise Services and System Applications. 

The Technical Services group has oversight of several of these functions. The Security and Operations division oversees managers in charge of governance and Data Protection, among other security needs. Some of these functions are outsourced through HCL. The Office of IT Projects and Planning includes Project Management functions. 

The Customer Care group heads the company's internal help desk and provides ITIL management. Other IT divisions are responsible for Global Office Applications and Project Management. Vendor Management is handled from the New York offices. IT at subsidiary Warner/Chappell Music, based in Los Angeles, CA, is headed by a CIO. A newer subsidiary is Rhino Records.





Sector (Industry)
Services (Media)


Employees
4553


Revenue
$3.4B


FYE
9/25




Breaking news on investment signals




Date
Type
Inside Scoop




2017-07-21
Project Scoop
Topic: Mergers & Acquisitions
Company: Warner Music Group Corp., New York, NY
Opportunity: Warner Music Group Corp. has recently acquired Songkick.




2017-03-01
Marketing Scoop
Topic: Marketing, CRM, Cloud.
Company: Warner Music Group Corp., New York, NY
Opportunity: A front-line source has indicated that CRM software is a spending priority. The organization has selected Salesforce Marketing Cloud and is currently implementing. This initiative will take place at the company headquarters. The organization uses contingent/contract workers for technology initiatives.




2016-12-23
Marketing Scoop
Topic: Email, Cloud, Automation.
Company: Warner Music Group Corp., New York, NY
Opportunity: A front-line source has indicated that email automation solutions are a spending priority. The organization has selected Salesforce Marketing Cloud and is currently implementing. This initiative will take place at the company headquarters. The organization uses contingent/contract workers for technology initiatives.







Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote




Technologies currently being used

IT
Marketing


Data Analytics/ Databases

Big Data/NoSQL
Apache PigCassandraClouderaDataStaxHadoopHiveMarkLogicMongoDBNoSQL Database

Business Intelligence
ActuateElastic SearchHyperion Performance ManagementIBM SPSSInformaticaJasperSoftMS SQL Reporting Services (SSRS)SAP BISAP BPCSAP Business Objects

Data Modeling/Mining
Amazon RedShiftCA ERwinHyperion EssbaseOmniture Data WarehouseOracle Data WarehousingPentahoTalend
Data Infrastructure

Cloud Systems
Adobe Creative CloudDell Cloud ManagerGoogle Cloud Appsnode.jsOpenStackPuppetScalrSymantec Veritas

Desktop Virtualization
DameWareVMware WorkstationWorkstationWSUS

Email Hosting
Google (mail server)Mimecast (mail server)Rackspace Email Hosting
Data Storage

Data Backup
CA ARCserveNorton GhostOracle RMANSymantec Backup ExecSymantec Enterprise VaultSymantec NetBackup

Disaster Recovery
Vision Solutions MIMIX

Enterprise Storage
NetAppNetApp Storage SystemsOracle Recovery ManagerQuantum StorNextSun ZFS
Enterprise/ ERP

CRM
SalesForceSAP CRMZendesk

Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP)
AgressoEpicor ERPOracle EBSSage ERPSAP ECCSAP ERPSAP R/3SAP SEM

Enterprise Systems Support
CA TechnologiesMicrosoft Enterprise Project ManagementPeopleSoft AppConnectSAP ApplicationsTomahawkWinshuttle
Industry Software

Academic and Education Management Software

Clinical

Financial Trading
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.
Advertising/ Search

Digital Media Operations

Online Advertising

Search Engine Optimization
Apache SolrAppNexusG Suite (Formerly known as Google Apps )Google AdSenseSearchmetrics
Analytics

Business Intelligence
ActuateAppceleratorIBM SPSSMS SQL Reporting Services (SSRS)PentahoPythonSAP BISAP Crystal ReportsTableau

Marketing Data Management
BOARDClouderaDataStaxHadoopMicrosoft SQL ServerMongoDBMySQLPostgreSQLTalend

Social Analytics
Adobe Marketing CloudAdRollPHP
Creative/ Content

Customer Experience Management
BasecampRedmineTrello

Mobile Design
Magic Software

User Experience
eCommerce

Mobile Commerce
CyberSource

Online Retailing
Amazon S3Apache ServerGoogle eCommerce Conversion TrackingMagentoPayPalRackSpaceRakuten LinkShareVMWareWordPress

Social Commerce
Amazon (cloud)Amazon Web ServicesBlackMesh (Hosting)GitHubProlexic Technologies (Hosting)Rackspace (cloud)
Product/ Brand Mgmt

Marketing Portfolio Management
RoboHTML

Mobile Application and Content Services
Apple iOSBlackBerryTwitterWindows Phone

Promotions
Moontoast
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.



Become a RainKing power-user today!
RainKing's rich data provides clients with a deeper understanding of who will be making – and what will be driving – upcoming investments in IT. Know what your prospects are planning before your competition does, and beat them to the negotiating table.
Request a demo
Request a quote




Org chart of IT decision makers




Howie Singer
Senior Vice President, Technology
___@wmg.com
+1 212-___-____






Tina Magpantay-Wyenn
Senior Director, Customer Care and IT Support
___@wmg.com
+1 818-___-____







Monroe Quarles
Senior Director, Technical Services
___@wmg.com
+1 818-___-____







Ashley Boswell
Senior Director, Label Services
___@wmg.com
+1 212-___-____






Tasnim Kaderbhai
Senior Manager, IT
___@wmg.com
+1 818-___-____











Rob Moore
Senior Vice President, Technology
___@wmg.com
+1 818-___-____







Kaliroe Martin
Executive Assistant for CIO and CTO
___@wmg.com
+1 212-___-____



This is just a subset of the full Org Chart for this company.


Want access to this and more? Become a client today!
RainKing clients get access to all 615 decision makers in this company's org chart.
Request a demo
Request a quote








Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote









To receive a FREE PDF of this company, simply fill out the form below










Get your free company profile




Search





Subscribe to our newsletter



Connect with Us
 





 





 





 





 







 




7700 Old Georgetown Road
Bethesda, MD 20814-6100
1.866.592.7122
contactus@rainkingonline.com


 Sitemap Terms of Use Privacy Policy 


©2017 RainKing














 


 












Alix Kram, Warner Music Group Corp. VP, Consumer Products, Global - REDBOOKS








































Brands, Marketers, Agencies. Search Less. Sell More.





/   SIGN IN

GET A FREE TRIAL   
CONTACT US: (800) 908-5395





















Alix  Kram
VP, Consumer Products, Global, Warner Music Group Corp.

EMAIL: 
                      







              Real-time sales trigger feed - generated by REDBOOKS machine learning and natural language processing technology, tracking 800,000+ news sources to aggregate all new executives, job/role changes and news on decision makers, brands and agencies in the media/marketing industry.
              

              This sales feed is for Alix  Kram at Warner Music Group Corp.. Alix  Kram works as VP, Consumer Products, Global , acting in a Brand/Product Management role .  Warner Music Group Corp. is a leader in Cultural & Recreational Entertainment .
              REDBOOKS tracks personnel changes for advertisers spending over $1 million annually.
              

              For more Brand/Product Management leads or media/marketing prospecting automation, start a free trial now.
              

Recent Related News


07/10/2017:


Alix Kram – VP of Global Brand Licensing: Music Biz 101 & More Podcast

Stephen Marcone & Professor David Philp, the show airs live each Wednesday at 8pm on WPSC-FM, Brave New Radio.
In this episode, Alix Kram, VP of Global Brand Licensing for Warner Music Group Artist Services, talks about entrepreneurship, how artists’ create their brand, and much more.
Jessica Essix is a current graduate student at William Paterson University pursuing a MBA in Music Management. .....

People In This Article:
Alix Kram
 

06/12/2017:


Protecting Your Creativity

On June 8th, Vice President of Global Brand Licensing for Artist Services at Warner Music Group Alix Kram joined subscribers of #theAgenda to share her insight on how we can protect our creativity both online and off.
For an hour, Alix dropped gems upon gems of wisdom that left everyone inspired, encouraged and motivated to be mindful of how they share their thoughts and work creatively. .....

People In This Article:
Alix Kram
 






Learn more about Alix  Kram  and 260,000+ key contacts

  Create targeted lead lists

  Gain insider knowledge with advanced machine  learning
  Real-time verified contact info



Enter Work Email:

Please enter email address.
 Please enter valid email address.









             Learn more about Alix  Kram and 260,000+ key contacts
            



























First Name *

 Please enter first name.




Last Name *

 Please enter last name.






Company Name *

 Please enter company name.






Email *





Phone *

 Please enter phone number.
 Please enter 10 digits number.





What industry are you in? *  
                (Please select one the categories below)
Please enter value for the industry.




                     Media Sales
                  




                     Production
                  




                     Ad-Tech/Mar-Tech
                  




                     Sponsorship Sales
                  



  Agency New Business
                  



  Other:
                  




What is your role? *
                 
                 (Please select one the categories below)
Please enter value for the role.



  C-Suite
                  



  VP/Manager
                  



  Sales Rep
                  



  Other:
                  














Thank you for registering for a Free REDBOOKS.com Trial!
We are processing your request and will be in touch shortly to get you started!
For Immediate Assistance, please call us at (800) 908-5395 or email us at info@redbooks.com


























Home
Learn More
FREE Trial


Features




AD THINK Events
Thought Leadership Events
Top Advertiser Directory
Top Agency Directory



Add Your Agency
Update Your Agency
Agency Showcase
Advertising Associations
Creative Spotlight
Services and Suppliers


About Us
Blog
Contact Us
Jobs
Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy





Customer Support
(800) 908-5395
Connect with us




















Copyright © 2017 Red Books LLC. All rights reserved














































Warner Music Group Corp. UPC & Barcode | Buycott



































UPC 

UPC
Product Name
Brand Name
Company Name














 Toggle navigation    
















Sign up





































Create Account
                  






Sign in




















Sign in
                    

Forgot password?







Easier Sign Up
Sign up with Facebook Sign up with Twitter
Already have an account?
Sign in with email 


Terms of Service














Sign up With Facebook


























 
Create Account
                






Terms of Service














Warner Music Group Corp.









Contact Information




Save




Save




Save




Save














1 supporting
2 avoiding
0 other campaigns











Support Marijuana Legalization



@NORML
20,685 members

Join

















Support Marijuana Legalization















Boycott ALEC Corporations



@AnaMardoll
22,780 members

Join

















Boycott ALEC Corporations













Oppose Internet Censorship (SOPA, PIPA, & beyond...)



@censored
20,806 members

Join

















Oppose Internet Censorship (SOPA, PIPA, & beyond...)










No campaigns matches








Brands














DOORS
Owned by Warner Music Group Corp.


7  products

























CURE
Owned by Warner Music Group Corp.


4  products

























WEA-DES MOINES VIDEO
Owned by Warner Music Group Corp.


3  products

























Warner Music
Owned by Warner Music Group Corp.


2  products



















Download Buycott
 


Get It









 







Warner Music Group Corp. :: Law360
































Search




Advanced Search

Take a Free Trial | 
					Sign In






















 Close


Law360 In-Depth
Law360 UK
Adv. Search & Platform Tools
Browse all sections 
Banking
Bankruptcy
Class Action
Competition
Employment
Energy
Expert Analysis
Insurance
Intellectual Property
Product Liability
Securities
Rankings
Law360's MVPs
Glass Ceiling Report
Global 20
Law360 400
Diversity Snapshot
Practice Group Partner Rankings
Practice Groups of the Year
Pro Bono Firms of the Year
Rising Stars
Trial Aces
Site Menu
Join the Law360 team
Search legal jobs
Learn more about Law360
Read testimonials
Contact Law360
Sign up for our newsletters
Site Map
Help













Warner Music Group Corp.


 News & Case Alert  on Warner Music Group ...



Services » Entertainment - Diversified » Warner Music Group Corp.






Menu options for Warner Music Group Corp. 


Everything »
News & Analysis »
New Cases »
New PTAB Cases »
New TTAB Cases »
Case Activity »
Outside Counsel »


                Data on cases, clients, outside counsel and individual attorneys collected from active federal civil cases. Reflects only recently published court data; not intended to be exhaustive. Not responsible for errors in court dockets.
            






×
Please assign a name to this alert






Save Alert
Cancel










News (239)


July 18, 2017
Music Downloaders Denied Class Cert. In Price-Fixing MDL
... defendants in the 11-year-old litigation, which also include Warner Music Group and UMG Recordings Inc., have...


July 12, 2017
Ed Sheeran Hit With 2nd IP Suit Over 'Let's Get It On'
... after the complaint was filed. The judge left Atlantic Recording Corp. and Warner Music Group Corp. in...


June  6, 2017
Greystar Lands $100M Loan For LA Mixed-Use Project
... into 255,000 square feet of creative office space. That development is already fully leased to Warner...


Cases (127)



July 11, 2017 | New York Southern
Townsend et al v. Sheeran et al
Copyright




June 30, 2017 | New York Eastern
McGregor v. VP Records et al
Copyright




June  5, 2017 | Georgia Northern
Archer v. Holmes et al
Copyright



PTAB Cases (0)

No results

TTAB Cases (9)



October 14, 2010 | 77924176
Warner Music Nashville LLC v CONCORD MUSIC GROUP INC




March  9, 2009 | 91189193
Born Ready Entertainment LLC v Warner Music Inc




December  8, 2008 | 91187987
Lance Stephenson v Warner Music Inc




To view all the results and drill down deeper, take a free trial now.



Try Law360 FREE for seven days
Already a subscriber? Click here to login
















×
Already have access? Click here to login



Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers
Register Now!




Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers













Email (Professional email required)






First Name



Last Name







PLEASE NOTE: A verification email will be sent to your address before you can access your trial.


Password (at least 6 characters required)



Confirm Password







Select at least one primary interest:


 Aerospace & Defense
										

 Appellate
										

 Asset Management
										

 Automotive
										

 Banking
										

 Bankruptcy
										

 California
										

 Capital Markets
										

 Class Action
										

 Commercial Contracts
										

 Competition
										

 Consumer Protection
										

 Corporate
										

 Cybersecurity & Privacy
										

 Delaware
										

 Employment
										

 Energy
										

 Environmental
										

 Financial Services Uk
										

 Florida
										

 Food & Beverage
										

 Government Contracts
										

 Health
										

 Hospitality
										

 Illinois
										

 Immigration
										

 Insurance
										

 Insurance Uk
										

 Intellectual Property
										

 International Arbitration
										

 International Trade
										

 Law360 In Depth
										

 Legal Ethics
										

 Life Sciences
										

 Media & Entertainment
										

 Medical Malpractice
										

 Mergers & Acquisitions
										

 Native American
										

 New Jersey
										

 New York
										

 Pennsylvania
										

 Private Equity
										

 Product Liability
										

 Project Finance
										

 Public Policy
										

 Real Estate
										

 Retail & E Commerce
										

 Securities
										

 Sports
										

 Tax
										

 Technology
										

 Telecommunications
										

 Texas
										

 Transportation
										

 Trials
										

 White Collar
										





Register




Already have access?




Email:



Password:

Forgot your password?


Remember login



Sign In


















Page not found - Plunkett Research, Ltd.




















































































Please wait while the search results are loading...








   


 
Plunkett Research,® Ltd.

Our Market Research = Your Smart Decisions









What are you looking for?









 

Information Marketing & Research PROS  
								Information for Students & Professors  
	                            Subscribers Log In


 








Unfortunately, the page you are seeing has been moved or deleted.


Please use our Industries List to see a full list of industries that we cover. This may help you find industry trends, statistics and other vital data. For general information about Plunkett Research, please see out Home Page.


What are you looking for?









 









































Warner Music Group Corp 1633 Broadway New York, NY Music Publishers - MapQuest







































































































    Warner Music Group Corp
  

1633 Broadway

New York
NY
10019




 Reviews



(212) 275-2000
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics









Opening Hours

Mon: 9am-5pm
Tue: 9am-5pm
Wed: 9am-5pm
Thu: 9am-5pm
Fri: 9am-5pm


































See a problem?
Let us know!


  
  
            The Warner Music Group Corporation, also known as WMG, is a public company that specializes in national and international repertoire. The company is engaged in recorded music and publishing businesses, as well as manages operations more than 50 countries. It offers artist management, merchandising, touring, VIP ticketing, sponsorship and brand endorsement solutions. The Warner Music Group Corporation also manages a subsidiary, Warner/Chappell Music, which is one of the world's leading music publishers. The subsidiary maintains a catalog of over 1 million songs from nearly 65,000 songwriters. The Warner Music Group Corporation maintains a collection of record labels, including Asylum, Atlantic, Bad Boy and Cordless.
          






















Legal






Help
























Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.



































Warner Music Group | WMG




























Skip directly to content























 































 










 









 









 




















 








Homepage Video



 

  
  
 WMG Intro 
  
 http://brightcove.vo.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/340485632/340485632_4817584351001_4817566088001.mp4 
  
  

 http://www.beberexha.com/ 
 Bebe Rexha - I Got You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2685/301939184_5386109686001_5386083529001.mp4 
  
 Bebe Rexha 
 I Got You 

 http://www.edsheeran.com/ 
 Ed Sheeran - Shape of You 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/3859/301939184_5386109614001_5386088907001.mp4 
  
 Ed Sheeran 
 Shape of You 

 http://www.greenday.com 
 Green Day - Bang Bang 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166810316001_5166783632001.mp4 
  
 Green Day 
 Bang Bang 

 http://www.brunomars.com 
 Bruno Mars - That's What I Like 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/2595/301939184_5386109697001_5386085565001.mp4 
  
 Bruno Mars 
 That's What I Like 

 https://www.thedoors.com/ 
 The Doors - Break On Through (To The Other Side) 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443848605001_4443809358001.mp4 
  
 The Doors 
 Break On Through (To The Other Side) 

 http://www.twentyonepilots.com/ 
 Twenty One Pilots - Heathens 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_5166896968001_5166880568001.mp4 
  
 Twenty One Pilots 
 Heathens 

 http://www.garyclarkjr.com/ 
 Gary Clark Jr. - The Healing 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/645/301939184_5386110933001_5386082540001.mp4 
  
 Gary Clark Jr.  
 The Healing 

 http://www.ledzeppelin.com/ 
 Led Zeppelin - Whole Lotta Love 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/301939184_4443837830001_4443781701001.mp4 
  
 Led Zeppelin 
 Whole Lotta Love 

 http://cleanbandit.co.uk/ 
 Clean Bandit - Rockabye 
  
 https://brightcove.hs.llnwd.net/e1/uds/pd/301939184/201704/1645/301939184_5386109909001_5386082539001.mp4 
  
 Clean Bandit 
 Rockabye 
 




 
 








User Content Moderation Menu

Add Photo
 









 









 









 









 









 






 



Warner Music Group





Recorded music
Publishing
Artist services
Culture
News
Careers
 












Recorded Music
Recorded MusicWMG’s family of labels—including Atlantic Records Group, Warner Bros. Records Inc., and Parlophone—is among the most prominent and successful in the history of music, encompassing a global roster of acclaimed artists and an unparalleled catalog including many of the world's most popular and influential recordings.
      		
      	



Publishing
PublishingWarner/Chappell Music, the global music publishing company of WMG, is home to an extraordinary catalog that includes timeless standards and contemporary hits, representing works by over 65,000 songwriters and composers, with a collection of more than one million copyrights. Warner/Chappell also includes Warner/Chappell Production Music.

      		



Artist Services
 Artist ServicesFor more than four decades, WMG has been an industry-leading force in providing a world-class array of services designed to help artists and labels grow their careers and their businesses. Artist & Label Services is the umbrella for WEA (Warner-Elektra-Atlantic) – the pioneering WEA distribution and marketing network – and Alternative Distribution Alliance (ADA) – the groundbreaking global distribution company for independent artists and labels.

      		



Culture
CultureWMG embraces a unique collection of world-renowned companies with distinct cultures, while embodying one unifying principle: it’s all about the music. The people of WMG are driven by a creative, independent spirit that stems from the company’s deep history in nurturing entrepreneurial thinking and artist-focused innovation.

      		



News



Careers

 






 




















 














 




























home onepage b

 





















 




 


 

































  
 July 14, 2017 
 Warner Music Group Acquires Selected Songkick Assets 
 READ MORE 

 July 10, 2017 
 Rani Hancock Named President of Sire Records 
 READ MORE 

 June 14, 2017 
 First Access Entertainment Signs Exclusive Worldwide Publishing Deal with Warner/Chappell Music 
 READ MORE 
 


SEE MORE NEWS
 
 









 






























Recorded Music


Publishing


Artist Services


Culture


news




Careers


Contact


FAQ




Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


wmg leadership


Investor Relations


artist royalties


human trafficking statement






















 










 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC. | WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices


 Copyright © 2017 Warner Music INC.WhyMusicMatters.Com | Ad Choices
 













 
 
 
 










 
























Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






















Warner Music Group (@warnermusic) | Twitter



























Skip to content









Home
Home
Home, current page.




About






Search query



Search Twitter









Searches you follow







Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @




















Language: English 



 



Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
English UK
Español
Filipino
Français
Hrvatski
Italiano
Magyar
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português
Română
Slovenčina
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български език
Русский
Српски
Українська мова
עִבְרִית
العربية
فارسی
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
ಕನ್ನಡ
ภาษาไทย
한국어
日本語
简体中文
繁體中文




 








Have an account?  Log in


   

Have an account?










Remember me

·
Forgot password?











New to Twitter?
Sign up
                











































      Warner Music GroupVerified account



@warnermusic












Tweets
Tweets, current page.
9,709
            



Following
Following
779



Followers
Followers
503K



Likes
Likes
140



Lists
Lists
3
 
 
More 







Likes
Lists






Unmute @warnermusic

Mute @warnermusic



Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  






















Warner Music GroupVerified account



@warnermusic


Follow the music.



            New York, NY

      



 
    wmg.com
  




Joined August 2008












                
                576 Photos and videos
            

            Photos and videos
          



















Tweets


Tweets
Tweets, current page.



                  Tweets & replies
                



                  Media
                





You blocked @warnermusic
Are you sure you want to view these Tweets? Viewing Tweets won't unblock @warnermusic
Yes, view profile






Close




            
            Warner Music Group followed
        






















Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







illion‏ @illion_official

Jul 20






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Brand new song “BANKA” is now digitally released. 

https://illion.lnk.to/BANKATC 





18 replies




542 retweets




3,980 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







CHASE ATLANTIC‏Verified account @ChaseAtlantic

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







PART 3 // OUT NOW 

https://itun.es/us/TSfglb 
https://open.spotify.com/album/3u8NLkV6Xh7ymn0UBzWuhZ …pic.twitter.com/uTFCez8tUW














christian anthony,
    CLINTON CAVE,
    MITCHEL CAVE  🌹 and
    2 others









Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








christian anthonyVerified account @ChristianAntho



                Follow the music.
            











Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








CLINTON CAVEVerified account @ClintonCave



                Follow the music.
            











Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








MITCHEL CAVE  🌹Verified account @MitchelCave



                Follow the music.
            











Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








Apple MusicVerified account @AppleMusic



                Follow the music.
            











Follow


      Following
  

      Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  








SpotifyVerified account @Spotify



                Follow the music.
            












45 replies




309 retweets




586 likes








Reply


45







Retweet


309




Retweeted


309








Like


586





Liked


586










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Atlantic Records‏Verified account @AtlanticRecords

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Today's all about the wins  @MeekMill's new release #WinsAndLosses out now  https://atlantic.lnk.to/WinsAndLosses pic.twitter.com/O4pcquO2pg
















7 replies




14 retweets




30 likes








Reply


7







Retweet


14




Retweeted


14








Like


30





Liked


30










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Atlantic Records‏Verified account @AtlanticRecords

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet


Embed Video







This weekend just got even hotter thanks to new music from @iamkevingates & more  #NoLove @1633Lifestyle - http://atlanti.cr/nmf721 pic.twitter.com/GEIf8b6FPm



















11 replies




11 retweets




17 likes








Reply


11







Retweet


11




Retweeted


11








Like


17





Liked


17










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Warner Bros. Records‏Verified account @wbr

Jul 20






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







pic.twitter.com/CkP9p4nQwv
















51 replies




4,175 retweets




7,550 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







MusiCares Foundation‏Verified account @MusiCares

Jul 19






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







We are thrilled to announce that GRAMMY winners @fleetwoodmac will be honored as 2018 #MusiCares Person of the Year: http://grm.my/2vgtkax pic.twitter.com/utlwoYL8gH
















40 replies




328 retweets




922 likes








Reply


40







Retweet


328




Retweeted


328








Like


922





Liked


922










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 19






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Need the perfect playlist for that perfect someone? Check out @Topsify's Love Songs playlist https://lnk.to/AMLoveSongs pic.twitter.com/eYFAIoJkGh



















2 replies




7 retweets




13 likes








Reply


2







Retweet


7




Retweeted


7








Like


13





Liked


13










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 19






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet


Embed Video







Can't get enough of the #fidgetsong? You could win 12 months of Spotify premium and custom fidget spinners here: http://lnk.to/SpinItToWinIt pic.twitter.com/Ui7qd2NxSv



















5 replies




4 retweets




9 likes








Reply


5







Retweet


4




Retweeted


4








Like


9





Liked


9










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Sire Records‏ @sirerecords

Jul 18






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







New Music Alert!! Check out @Coldfrontsmusic' second summer single, “Never Been To Paris.” https://open.spotify.com/album/5toSCCCCOj1XPWQ3ovAMCm … #NewMusic #ColdFronts









2 replies




7 retweets




16 likes








Reply


2







Retweet


7




Retweeted


7








Like


16





Liked


16










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Warner Bros. Records‏Verified account @wbr

Jul 17






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







JUST ANNOUNCED: @liamgallagher will perform in-store at @RoughTradeNYC on 7/30 in support of his new album, As You Were, available Oct 6th.pic.twitter.com/De5xNelxDg
















5 replies




19 retweets




54 likes








Reply


5







Retweet


19




Retweeted


19








Like


54





Liked


54










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 17






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet


Embed Video







Need a Monday afternoon pick-me-up? Check out @topsify's 100 Most Uplifting Songs Ever playlist! https://lnk.to/AM100MostUpliftingSongs …pic.twitter.com/XJTI8uf7Gm



















4 replies




5 retweets




7 likes








Reply


4







Retweet


5




Retweeted


5








Like


7





Liked


7










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 17






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







.@edsheeran Sings in 'Game of Thrones' Season 7 Premiere: Watch http://www.billboard.com/articles/columns/pop/7866169/ed-sheeran-game-of-thrones-season-7-premiere-song … via @billboard #GoT









2 replies




10 retweets




37 likes








Reply


2







Retweet


10




Retweeted


10








Like


37





Liked


37










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Warner Bros. Records‏Verified account @wbr

Jul 14






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






Warner Bros. Records Retweeted U.S. Olympic Team

Congratulations to @SWStheband! Their new single #Legends has been selected as the official song for @TeamUSA! https://twitter.com/teamusa/status/885867964813131777 …

Warner Bros. Records added,











1:16






U.S. Olympic TeamVerified account @TeamUSA

#TeamUSA is proud to announce LEGENDS by @SWStheband​ as our OFFICIAL song on the road to the 2018 #WinterOlympics! pic.twitter.com/c7xYn19IUF









18 replies




367 retweets




967 likes








Reply


18







Retweet


367




Retweeted


367








Like


967





Liked


967










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Sleeping With Sirens‏Verified account @SWStheband

Jul 12






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet


Embed Video







Legends 7.14.17 #GOSSIPpic.twitter.com/Pznpo2dCPe



















419 replies




2,626 retweets




5,086 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







ECHOSMITH‏Verified account @echosmith

Jul 14






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







#GOODBYE IS HERE! We are so excited to share our brand new single and music video! Click to watch it now!  
https://WBR.lnk.to/Goodbye pic.twitter.com/FtoJFd6mNn
















76 replies




493 retweets




1,400 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Coldplay‏Verified account @coldplay

Jul 13






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







The Kaleidoscope EP is out digitally now! 
Click to download / stream it https://parlopho.ne/KaleidoscopeEP pic.twitter.com/092lLlifMy
















368 replies




2,983 retweets




7,917 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 14






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Warner Music Group Acquires Selected @Songkick Assetshttp://www.wmg.com/news/warner-music-group-acquires-selected-songkick-assets-23301?cmpid=wmg/twitter/tweet-button/news-detail …









1 reply




21 retweets




19 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


21




Retweeted


21








Like


19





Liked


19










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 14






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Gina Tucci Promoted to Big Beat Label Manager, Talks Growth & Label Expansion http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/dance/7801317/gina-tucci-big-beat-interview … via @billboard









3 replies




6 retweets




24 likes








Reply


3







Retweet


6




Retweeted


6








Like


24





Liked


24










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Warner Music Group‏Verified account @warnermusic

Jul 13






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Bruno Mars' 'That's What I Like' Ties Record for Most Weeks Atop Hot R&B Songs Chart http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/7865215/bruno-mars-thats-what-i-like-ties-record-for-most-weeks-atop-hot-rb-songs-chart … via @billboardbiz









2 replies




7 retweets




19 likes








Reply


2







Retweet


7




Retweeted


7








Like


19





Liked


19










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Warner Music Group Retweeted
            







Warner Bros. Records‏Verified account @wbr

Jul 12






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






Warner Bros. Records Retweeted ECHOSMITH

 Days left...https://twitter.com/echosmith/status/885174938839138305 …

Warner Bros. Records added,











0:33






ECHOSMITHVerified account @echosmith

So close... #Goodbye pic.twitter.com/JQ5Z33AI2O









7 replies




26 retweets




80 likes








Reply


7







Retweet


26




Retweeted


26








Like


80





Liked


80










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo












          @warnermusic hasn't Tweeted yet.
      
Back to top ↑












Loading seems to be taking a while.

      Twitter may be over capacity or experiencing a momentary hiccup. Try again or visit Twitter Status for more information.
    

















      New to Twitter?
    


    Sign up now to get your own personalized timeline!
  

Sign up




You may also like
    ·
    Refresh








false












© 2017 Twitter
About
Help Center
Terms
Privacy policy
Cookies
Ads info




















Close




            
            Choose a trend location
          






















Dismiss











Close







            Previous
          







            Next
          













Close



Go to a person's profile












Searches you follow







Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @


























Close



Promote this Tweet

















Close



Block






Cancel
Block












Add a location to your Tweets

        When you tweet with a location, Twitter stores that location. 
        You can switch location on/off before each Tweet and always have the option to delete your location history.
        Learn more


Turn location on
Not now


























Close



Share Location















Results from 



Send









Close



Your lists













Close



Create a new list




List name




Description

Under 100 characters, optional



Privacy



Public · Anyone can follow this list
      


Private · Only you can access this list
      




Save list











Close
























Close



Copy link to Tweet




Here's the URL for this Tweet. Copy it to easily share with friends.












Close



Embed this Tweet
Embed this Video



Add this Tweet to your website by copying the code below. Learn more
Add this video to your website by copying the code below. Learn more




Hmm, there was a problem reaching the server. Try again?






            Include parent Tweet
          




            Include media
          




By embedding Twitter content in your website or app, you are agreeing to the Twitter Developer Agreement and Developer Policy.
Preview












Close



Why you're seeing this ad
















Close



Log in to Twitter
















Remember me

·
Forgot password?












        Don't have an account? Sign up »









Close



Sign up for Twitter





Not on Twitter? Sign up, tune into the things you care about, and get updates as they happen.


Sign up




        Have an account? Log in »









Close



Two-way (sending and receiving) short codes:





Country
Code
For customers of




United States
40404
(any)


Canada
21212
(any)


United Kingdom
86444
Vodafone, Orange, 3, O2


Brazil
40404
Nextel, TIM


Haiti
40404
Digicel, Voila


Ireland
51210
Vodafone, O2


India
53000
Bharti Airtel, Videocon, Reliance


Indonesia
89887
AXIS, 3, Telkomsel, Indosat, XL Axiata


Italy
4880804
Wind


3424486444
Vodafone





        » See SMS short codes for other countries













Close



Confirmation



















Close



 
















Close














            Skip all
          




    Welcome home!
  
This timeline is where you’ll spend most of your time, getting instant updates about what matters to you.




    Tweets not working for you?
  

    Hover over the profile pic and click the Following button to unfollow any account.
  




    Say a lot with a little
  

    When you see a Tweet you love, tap the heart — it lets  the person who wrote it know you shared the love.
  




    Spread the word
  

    The fastest way to share someone else’s Tweet with your followers is with a Retweet. Tap the icon to send it instantly.
  




    Join the conversation
  

    Add your thoughts about any Tweet with a Reply. Find a topic you’re passionate about, and jump right in.
  




    Learn the latest
  

    Get instant insight into what people are talking about now.
  




    Get more of what you love
  

    Follow more accounts to get instant updates about topics you care about.
  




    Find what's happening
  

    See the latest conversations about any topic instantly.
  




    Never miss a Moment
  

    Catch up instantly on the best stories happening as they unfold.
  



Back
Next














Next Tweet from user

























Warner Music Group - Wikipedia






















 







Warner Music Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Warner Music Group Corp.




Industry
Music, entertainment


Founded
1958; 59 years ago (1958)
(as Warner Bros. Records)
1971; 46 years ago (1971)
(as Warner Elektra Atlantic)


Headquarters
New York, New York, United States



Key people

Stephen Cooper (CEO)


Revenue
US$2.87 billion (2013)[1]



Number of employees

3,550 (2012)


Parent
Warner Communications
(1972–1990)
Time Warner
(1990–2004)
Independent
(2004–2011)
Access Industries
(2011–present)


Website
www.wmg.com


Warner Music Group (abbreviated as WMG, commonly referred to as Warner Music or WEA International) is an American multinational entertainment and record label conglomerate headquartered in New York City. It is one of the "big three" recording companies and the third largest in the global music industry, next to Universal Music Group (UMG) and Sony Music Entertainment (SME), being the only American music conglomerate worldwide. Formerly owned by Time Warner, the company was publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange until May 2011, when it announced its privatization and sale to Access Industries, which was completed in July 2011. With a multibillion-dollar annual turnover, WMG employs in excess of 3,500 people and has operations in more than 50 countries throughout the world.[2]
The company owns and operates some of the largest and most successful record labels in the world, including its flagship labels Warner Bros. Records, Parlophone and Atlantic Records. WMG also owns Warner/Chappell Music, one of the world's largest music publishers.



Contents


1 History

1.1 1950s and 1960s

1.1.1 Atlantic exerts autonomy


1.2 1970s

1.2.1 Worldwide distribution
1.2.2 Warner Communications


1.3 1980s
1.4 1990s
1.5 2000s
1.6 2010s


2 Music publishing
3 List of Warner labels
4 Controversy

4.1 CD price fixing
4.2 YouTube
4.3 Music streaming services


5 See also
6 References
7 Bibliography
8 External links



History[edit]
1950s and 1960s[edit]
The film company had no record label division at the time and one of its contracted actors, Tab Hunter, scored a hit song for Dot Records, which was a division of rival Paramount Pictures. In order to prevent any repetition of its actors recording for rival companies, and to also capitalize on the music business, Warner Bros. Records was created. In 1963, Warner purchased Reprise Records, which had been founded by Frank Sinatra three years earlier so that he could have more creative control over his recordings. With the Reprise acquisition, Warner gained the services of Mo Ostin, who would be mainly responsible for the success of Warner/Reprise.
The Canadian unit was opened in 1967 as Warner Reprise Canada Ltd, now called Warner Music Canada Co.[3]
After Warner Bros. was sold to Seven Arts Productions in 1967 (forming Warner Bros.-Seven Arts), it purchased Atlantic Records, founded in 1947 and WMG's oldest label (until WMG completed its acquisition of Parlophone in 2013), as well as its subsidiary Atco Records. This acquisition brought Neil Young into the company fold, initially as a member of Buffalo Springfield. Young would become one of Warner's longest-established artists, recording both as a solo artist and with groups under the Warner-owned Atlantic, Atco, and Reprise labels, as well as making five albums for Geffen Records during that label's period of Warner distribution. The Geffen catalogue, now owned by Universal Music Group, represents Young's only major recordings not under WMG ownership.
In 1969, two years after being purchased by Seven Arts, the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts company was sold to the Kinney National Company. Kinney (later changing its name to Warner Communications) combined the operations of all of its record labels, and Kinney CEO Steve Ross led the group through its most successful period until his death in 1992.
An earlier attempt by Warner Bros. Records to create an in-house distribution arm in 1958 didn't materialize. So in 1969, Elektra Records boss Jac Holzman approached Atlantic's Jerry Wexler with the idea of setting up a joint distribution network for Warner, Elektra, and Atlantic. An experimental branch was established in Southern California as a possible prototype for an expanded operation.[4]
Atlantic, its subsidiary Atco Records, and its affiliate Stax Records paved the way for Warner's rise to industry prominence. The purchase brought in Atlantic's lucrative back-catalogue, which included classic recordings by Ray Charles, the Drifters, the Coasters, and many more. In the mid 1960s, Atlantic/Stax had released a string of landmark soul music recordings by artists including Booker T & the MGs, Sam & Dave, Wilson Pickett, Otis Redding, Ben E. King, and Aretha Franklin. But the sale led to Stax leaving the Atlantic fold because the new Warner owners insisted on keeping the rights to Stax recordings. However, Atlantic also moved decisively into rock and pop in the late 1960s and 1970s, signing major British and American acts including Led Zeppelin, Cream, Crosby Stills & Nash, Yes, Emerson, Lake & Palmer, Average White Band, Dr John, King Crimson, Bette Midler, Roxy Music, and Foreigner.
Atlantic exerts autonomy[edit]
It was soon apparent in 1969 that Atlantic/Atco president Ahmet Ertegün viewed Warner/Reprise president Mike Maitland as a rival. Maitland believed that, as vice-president in charge of the Warner Bros.-Seven Arts music division, he should have final say over all recording operations, and he further angered Ertegün by proposing that most of Atlantic's back-office functions (such as marketing and distribution) be combined with the existing departments at Warner/Reprise. In retrospect Ertegün clearly feared that Maitland would ultimately have more power than him and so he moved rapidly to secure his own position and remove Maitland.
Maitland had put off renegotiating the contracts of Joe Smith and Mo Ostin, the presidents of the Warner Bros. and Reprise labels, and this provided Ertegün with an effective means of undermining Maitland. When Wexler—now a major shareholder—found out about the contract issue he and Ertegün began pressuring Eliot Hyman to get Smith and Ostin under contract, ostensibly because they were worried that the two executives might move to rival labels—and in fact Ostin had received overtures from both the MGM and ABC labels.
In 1969, the wisdom of Hyman's investments was proved when Kinney National Company purchased Warner Bros.-Seven Arts for $400 million, more than eight times what Hyman had paid for Warner/Reprise and Atlantic combined. From the base of his family's funeral parlour business, Kinney president Steve Ross had rapidly built the Kinney company into a profitable conglomerate with interests that included comic publishing, the Ashley-Famous talent agency, parking lots and cleaning services. Following the takeover, Warners' music group briefly adopted the 'umbrella' name Kinney Music, because U.S. anti-trust laws at the time prevented the three labels from trading as one.
Ross was primarily focused on rebuilding the company's ailing movie division and was happy to defer to the advice of the managers of the company's record labels, since he knew that they were generating most of the group's profits. Ertegun's campaign against Maitland began in earnest that summer. Atlantic had agreed to help Warner Bros. in its efforts to establish its labels overseas, beginning with its soon-to-be-established Warner Bros. subsidiary in Australia, but when Warner executive Phil Rose arrived in Australia, he discovered that just one week earlier Atlantic had signed a new four-year distribution deal with a rival local label, Festival Records (owned by Rupert Murdoch's News Limited). Mike Maitland complained bitterly to Kinney executive Ted Ashley, but to no avail[5] – by this time Ertegun was poised to make his move against Maitland.
As he had with Hyman, Ertegun urged Steve Ross to extend Mo Ostin and Joe Smith's contracts, a recommendation Ross was happy to accept. Ostin however had received overtures from other companies including MGM Records and ABC Records and when he met with Ertegun in January 1970 and was offered Maitland's job, he was unwilling to re-sign immediately. In response, Ertegun broadly hinted that Maitland's days were numbered and that he, Ertegun, was about to take over the recording division.
Unlike the Warner/Reprise executives, Atlantic's execs the Ertegun brothers (Ahmet and Neshui) and Wexler owned stock in Kinney.[6]
Ostin was understandably concerned that, if he accepted the position, the Warner Bros. staff would feel that he had stabbed Maitland in the back, but his attorney convinced him that Maitland's departure was inevitable, regardless of whether or not he accepted the post (succinctly advising him, "Don't be a schmuck"). On Sunday January 25, Ted Ashley went to Maitland's house to tell him he had been dismissed, and Maitland declined the offer of a job at the movie studio. One week later, Mo Ostin was named as the new President of Warner Bros. Records, with Joe Smith as his Executive Vice-President.[7] Ertegun nominally remained the head of Atlantic, but since both Ostin and Smith owed their new positions to him, Ertegun was now the de facto head of the Warner music division. Ertegun was given the formal title of executive vice-president-Music Group.[6] Maitland moved to MCA Records later that year and successfully consolidated MCA's labels, which he couldn't do at Warner.
1970s[edit]
During the 1970s, the Kinney group built up a commanding position in the music industry. In 1970, Kinney bought Elektra Records and its sister label Nonesuch Records (founded by Jac Holzman in 1950) for $10 million, bringing in leading rock acts, including the Doors, Tim Buckley, and Love, and its historically significant folk archive, along with the successful budget Western classical-music label Nonesuch Records. The purchase of Elektra-Nonesuch brought a rich back catalogue of folk music as well as the renowned Nonesuch catalogue of classical and world music. Elektra founder Jac Holzman ran the label under Warners for two years, but by that time, he was by his own admission "burnt out" after twenty years in the business. Kinney president Steve Ross subsequently appointed Holzman as part of a seven-person "brains trust" tasked with investigating opportunities presented by new technologies, a role Holzman was eager to accept.[8] The same year, the group established its first overseas offices in Canada and Australia. By that time the "Seven Arts" moniker was dropped from the Warner Bros. name. Warner Bros. also founded the Casablanca Records subsidiary, headed by Neil Bogart; but several years later Casablanca would become independent of Warner Bros.
Worldwide distribution[edit]
With the Elektra acquisition, the next step was forming an in-house distribution arm for the co-owned labels. By this time, Warner-Reprise's frustrations with its current distributors had reached breaking point; Joe Smith (then Executive Vice-President of Warner Bros.) recalled that the Grateful Dead were becoming a major act but the distributor was constantly out of stock of their albums. These circumstances facilitated the full establishment of the group's in-house distribution arm, initially called Kinney Record Group International.[9][10] By late 1972, US anti-trust laws had changed and the company was renamed Warner-Elektra-Atlantic, WEA for short, which was renamed Warner Music in 1991 (the word "group" was added after the formation of AOL Time Warner).
WEA was an early champion of the heavy metal rock music. Several such bands, including the three major pioneers Led Zeppelin, Black Sabbath, and Deep Purple, were all signed to WEA's labels at least in the United States. Among the earliest American metal acts to be signed to WEA were Alice Cooper, Montrose, and Van Halen.
Up to this point the Kinney-owned record companies had relied on licensing deals with overseas record labels to manufacture, distribute and promote its products in other countries; concurrent with the establishment of its new distribution arm, the company now began establishing subsidiaries in the other major markets, beginning with the creation of Warner Bros. Records Australia in 1970,[11] soon followed by branch offices in the UK, Europe and Japan. In July 1971, the new in-house distribution company was incorporated as Warner-Elektra-Atlantic Distributing Corp. (WEA) and branch offices were established in eight major US cities; Joel Friedman a one-time Billboard writer who had been the head of Warner's advertising/merchandising division in its early years, was appointed to head WEA's US domestic division, and Ahmet Ertegun's brother Nesuhi was appointed to oversee its international operations. Neshui Ertegun, originally a Turkish native like his brother, displayed a global perspective and independence from its U.S. counterpart by successfully promoting international acts in their target markets worldwide. Ertegun headed WEA International until his retirement in 1987. A de facto committee of three senior marketing executives—Dave Glew from Atlantic, Ed Rosenblatt from Warner Bros. and Mel Posner from Elektra—oversaw the integration of each label's marketing and distribution through the new division,[10] but each label continued to operate totally independently in A&R matters and also applied their own expertise in marketing and advertising.[12]
On July 1, 1971, following the pattern set by similar joint ventures in Canada and Australia, the Warner labels entered into a partnership with the British arm of CBS Records to press and distribute Warner-Reprise product in the United Kingdom, although this was undertaken as a cooperative venture rather than a formally incorporated business partnership. The Billboard article that reported the new arrangement also noted that, despite their intense competition in the US market, CBS continued to press Warner-Reprise recordings in the USA. However the new UK arrangement was a major blow to Warner's previous British manufacturer Pye Records, for whom Warner-Reprise had been their largest account. With the scheduled addition of the UK rights to the Atlantic catalogue, which would revert to Kinney in early 1972, Billboard predicted that the Warner-CBS partnership would have a 25–30% share of the UK music market.[13]
In April 1971, thanks mainly to the influence of Ahmet Ertegun, the Kinney group announced a major coup with its acquisition of the worldwide rights to the Rolling Stones' new label Rolling Stones Records, following the expiration of the band's contract with British Decca (then separate from the American label) and the acrimonious end to their business relationship with their former manager Allen Klein. Under the terms of the deal, Atlantic subsidiary Atco would distribute the Stones' recordings in the USA, with other territories mainly handled by Warner Bros. international divisions.[14]
One of Kinney's wisest investments was Fleetwood Mac. The band signed to Reprise in the early 1970s after relocating to the USA and the label supported them through numerous lineup changes and several lean years during which the band's records sold relatively poorly, although they remained a popular concert attraction. Ironically, after their transfer to Warner Bros. in 1975 and the recruitment of new members Lindsay Buckingham and Stevie Nicks, the group scored a major international hit with the single "Rhiannon" and consolidated with the best selling albums Fleetwood Mac, Rumours and Tusk.
Warner Communications[edit]
Due to a financial scandal involving price fixing in its parking operations,[15] Kinney National spun off its non-entertainment assets in 1972 (as National Kinney Corporation) and changed its name to Warner Communications Inc..
In 1972, the Warner group acquired another rich prize, David Geffen's Asylum Records. The $7 million purchase brought in several acts who would prove crucial the Warner group's subsequent success, including Linda Ronstadt, the Eagles, Jackson Browne, Joni Mitchell and later Warren Zevon. On the downside, however, it was rumored that Warners was soon concerned about their possible liability under the California State Labor Code because of Geffen's questionable status as both the manager of most of the Asylum acts and the head of the record label to which they were signed. The sale included the Asylum Records label and its recordings, as well as Geffen's lucrative music publishing assets and the interests in the royalties of some of the artists managed by Geffen and partner Elliot Roberts. Geffen accepted a five-year contract with WCI and turned over his 75% share in the Geffen-Roberts management company to Roberts and Warners paid Geffen and Roberts 121,952 common shares worth $4,750,000 at the time of the sale, plus $400,000 in cash and a further $1.6 million in promissory notes convertible to common stock.[16]
Although it seemed a lucrative deal at the time, Geffen soon had reason to regret it. Uncharacteristically, he had greatly underestimated the value of his assets—within Asylum's first year as a Warner subsidiary, albums by Linda Ronstadt and the Eagles alone had earned more than the entire value of the Asylum sale. Geffen's discomfort was compounded by the fact that, within six months of the sale, the value of his volatile Warner shares had plummeted from $4.5 million to just $800,000. He appealed to Steve Ross to intervene, and as part of a make-good deal, Ross agreed to pay him the difference in the share value over five years. Acting on Jac Holzman's suggestion that Kinney should take Asylum from Atlantic and merge it with Elektra, Ross then appointed Geffen to run the new combined label.[17]
In 1976, Warner gained a brief early lead in digital media when it purchased the Atari computer company, and in 1981 it bought The Franklin Mint company. WCI also blazed the trail in visual music with MTV, which it created and co-owned in partnership with American Express. In 1984–85, Warner rapidly divested many of these recent acquisitions, including Atari, Franklin Mint, Panavision, MTV Networks and a cosmetics business.
In 1977, Warner-Elektra-Atlantic formed Pacific Records for their composers and distributed (appropriately) by Atlantic Records. Alan O'Day was the first artist signed to the label, and the first release was "Undercover Angel". The song, which he described as a "nocturnal novelette," was in February 1977. Within a few months it had become #1 in the country, and has sold approximately two million copies. It was also a hit in Australia, reaching #9 on the Australian Singles Chart. "Undercover Angel" also landed O'Day in an exclusive club as one of only a handful of writers/performers to pen a #1 hit for themselves and a #1 for another artist.[18][19]
New signings in the late 1970s placed WEA in a strong position for the 1980s. A deal with Seymour Stein's Sire Records label (which Warner Bros. Records later took over) brought in several major punk rock and new wave acts including the Pretenders, the Ramones and Talking Heads and, most importantly, rising star Madonna; Elektra signed the Cars and Warner Bros. signed Prince, giving WEA several of the biggest-selling acts of the decade.
WEA's labels also distributed a number of otherwise independent labels. For example, Warner Bros. distributed Straight Records, DiscReet Records, Bizarre Records, Bearsville Records, and Geffen Records (the latter was sold to MCA in 1990). Atlantic Records distributed Swan Song Records. In 1975, WEA scored a major coup by signing a distribution agreement with Island Records, which only covered the United States and select other countries. For the next 14 years (initially with Warner Bros. until 1982, then with Atlantic afterward), WEA would distribute such artists as Bob Marley, U2, Robert Palmer, Anthrax, and Tom Waits. This relationship ended when Island was sold to PolyGram in 1989.
1980s[edit]
A proposed 1983 international merger between PolyGram and WEA was forbidden by both the US Federal Trade Commission and West Germany's cartel office, so PolyGram's half-owner Philips then purchased a further 40% of the company from its partner Siemens, and bought the remaining shares in 1987. The same year, PolyGram divested its film and publishing operations, closed PolyGram Pictures and sold Chappell Music to Warner for US$275 million.
WEA signed with MCA Records a distribution agreement of this disco-graphic house outside US in 1983, which lasted until 1990.
WEA formed WEA Manufacturing in 1986.[20] In 1988 WEA took over the German classical label Teldec and the British Magnet label.
In 1989, it was announced that Warner Communications was to merge with Time Inc. to form Time Warner, a transaction that was completed in 1990. Following the merger, WEA continued acquiring independent labels, buying CGD Records (Italy) and MMG Records (Japan) in 1989.
1990s[edit]
Through the 1990s, Time Warner was the largest media company in the world, with assets in excess of US$20 billion and annual revenues in the billions of dollars; by 1991, Warner's music labels were generating sales valued at more than US$3 billion, with operating profits of $550 million[21] and by 1995 its music division dominated the US music industry with a 22% share of the domestic market.[22] Acquisitions and corporate changes within the Warner group of labels continued after the Time Warner merger—in 1990 WEA purchased French label Carrere Records, WEA was renamed Warner Music Group in 1991, leading French classical label Erato (1992) and in 1993 WEA bought the Spanish DRO Records, Hungary's Magneoton label, the Swedish Telegram Records, Brazil's Continental Records and Finnish label Fazer Musiiki. Also Miguel Tomas Lucio was signed to the label.
Atlantic launched two new subsidiary labels in the early 1990s: East West Records and Interscope Records. In 1995, East West absorbed Atco Records and was eventually folded into Elektra Records. In 1996, Interscope was purchased by MCA Music Entertainment.
During 1992, the Warner Music Group faced one of the most serious public-relations crises in its history when a major controversy erupted over the provocative Warner Bros. recording "Cop Killer" from the self-titled album by Body Count, a heavy metal/rap fusion band led by Ice-T. Unfortunately for Warner, the song (which mentioned the Rodney King case) was issued just before the controversial acquittal of the police charged with King's beating, which sparked the 1992 Los Angeles Riots and the confluence of events put the song under the national spotlight. Complaints escalated over the summer—conservative police associations called for a boycott of Time Warner products, politicians including President George H. W. Bush denounced the label for releasing the song, Warner executives received death threats, Time Warner stockholders threatened to pull out of the company and the New Zealand police commissioner unsuccessfully tried to have the record banned there. Although Ice-T later voluntarily reissued Body Count without "Cop Killer", the furor seriously rattled Warner Music and in January 1993 the label made an undisclosed deal releasing Ice-T from his contract and returning the Body Count master tapes to him.[23]
Also in 1992, the Rhino Records label signed a distribution agreement with Atlantic Records and Time Warner bought a 50% stake in the Rhino Records label. The distribution agreement allowed Rhino to begin reissuing recordings from Atlantic's back catalogue.
In 1994, Canadian beverage giant Seagram bought a 14.5% stake in Time Warner, and the Warner publishing division—now called Warner/Chappell Music – acquired CPP/Belwin, becoming the world's largest owner of song copyrights and the world's largest publisher of printed music. In 1996, Time Warner made another dramatic expansion of its media holdings, taking over the Turner Broadcasting System, which by then included the Turner cable TV network, CNN and the screen production houses Castle Rock Entertainment and New Line Cinema, acquisitions that would bring huge profits into the Warner Group thanks to content assets like Seinfeld and the highly successful The Lord of the Rings film trilogy.
By the early 1990s, senior Warner staff like Ostin and Waronker had remained in their positions for several decades—a highly unusual situation in the American music industry—but the death of Steve Ross destabilized the Time Warner hierarchy, and over the next few years the music group was increasingly disrupted by internal power struggles, leading to a string of major executive upheavals in 1994–95, which The New York Times described as "a virtual civil war".[24]
The central conflict was between Mo Ostin and Warner Music Group chairman Robert Morgado, who had joined the Warner group in the late 1980s. Because of his political background (he had been the chief-of-staff to former New York Governor Hugh L. Carey) and his lack of music industry experience—especially compared to the widely revered Ostin—Morgado was viewed as an outsider at Warner. Nevertheless, he gained favour with Ross and Levin and was promoted in 1985 to oversee the Warner international music division after helping the company slash costs in its computer game sector.[22]
Since his appointment as head of WBR, Ostin had always reported directly to Steve Ross and Ross's successor Gerald Levin, but in late 1993, when Ostin's contract came up for renewal, Morgado asserted his authority, insisting that Ostin should now report directly to him. The tensions between them reached boiling point in July 1994 when Morgado appointed former Atlantic chief Doug Morris to head the Warner Music Group in the USA, a decision that many saw as a deliberate move to hasten the departure of Ostin and Elektra head Robert Krasnow.[22] Morgado's new structure was announced in August 1994 and Bob Krasnow resigned from Elektra the next day. Within days, after more than 30 years with the Warner music group and more than 20 years as President and Chairman of Warner Bros. Records, Ostin announced he would not renew his current contract and would leave Warners when it expired on December 31, 1994. There was more negative publicity the following month, when leading Elektra act Metallica launched a lawsuit against the label, seeking a release from their contract and ownership of their master tapes, and claiming that Morgado had refused to honour a deal they had worked out with Krasnow before he quit.
Ostin's departure marked a seismic shift in the corporate culture at WBR and the news was greeted with dismay by industry insiders and the many artists whose careers he had helped to nurture. Lenny Waronker had agreed to take over as WBR chairman and CEO but in October 1994 he announced that he would not be taking up the position; he initially said that he would remain as President of WBR[25] but by this time there was already widespread speculation that he would leave, and he did so soon afterwards. The following year he re-joined Ostin and son Michael as joint head of the newly launched DreamWorks label.[26]
Beginning in August 1994, Morgado alienated Morris by his clumsy handling of Warner's relationship with Interscope Records, the successful label founded by Ted Field and Jimmy Iovine and part-owned by Warner. Morgado had resisted making a decision about increasing the Warner stake in Interscope, which encouraged other companies to make overtures to the label; in response, Morgado threatened to send cease-and-desist notices to executives at several record companies, demanding that they stop approaching Interscope with buyout offers, a move that reportedly infuriated Iovine.[22]
By late 1994, Morris was gaining the upper hand over his rival and media reports claimed that Morris had moved to settle with Metallica, offering a deal that was reportedly even more generous than the one they had worked out with Krasnow. Morgado now faced a showdown with Morris, who felt he was not being allowed to run WMG as he saw fit. In October 1994, Morris and 11 other Warner executives "staged an unprecedented insurrection that nearly paralyzed the world's largest record company".[22] This led to a climactic meeting between Morris and Gerald Levin in late October, at which Morris reportedly threatened to quit if he had to continue to report to Morgado.[27]
Morgado gave in to the demand that Morris be granted autonomy to run the North American operations and he was forced to upgrade Morris's position from chief operating officer to Chief Executive of Warner Music Group (USA); Morris promptly named Danny Goldberg, former president of Atlantic Records, to run WBR in defiance of Morgado, who had a different candidate in mind[28] and Levin also reduced Morgado's power to oversee Warner's mail-order record club division and its international operations.[22] Morris then brought in Sylvia Rhone and Seymour Stein to stabilize Elektra, settled the Metallica lawsuit and persuaded Levin to purchase an additional 25% of Interscope,[22] although this initiative proved short-lived.
The power struggle between Morgado and Morris reached a dramatic climax in May 1995 when Morgado was asked to resign by Gerald Levin, following a welter of complaints from executives at the three major Warner Music labels, who said that Morgado was undermining Morris's authority and damaging Warner's reputation among performers.[28] Morgado was immediately replaced by HBO chairman Michael J. Fuchs but the corporate upheavals did not end there; in late June 1995 Fuchs abruptly dismissed Doug Morris, saying that Morris had been "leading a campaign to destabilize Warner Music in an effort to seize control of the company". As Morris's strongest ally, Danny Goldberg was also under threat; he was initially told that he could stay on as President of WBR as long as he refrained from office politics and concentrate on the day-to-day management of the label, but he resigned as President of Warner Bros. Records soon after to pursue "other interests", and was replaced by WBR vice-chairman Russ Thyret.
Despite early success with Dr. Dre and Snoop Dogg, and Morris's decision to increase Warner's stake to 50%, by the mid-1990s Interscope Records was being seen as a liability for the Warner group. Time Warner's board and investors had already been bruised by the damaging 1992 "Cop Killer" controversy and now they were faced with renewed criticism about the gangsta rap genre, in which Interscope's associate imprint Death Row Records was a key label. In mid-1995, Time Warner refused to distribute the Interscope album Dogg Food by Tha Dogg Pound, forcing the label to seek outside distribution, and late in the year TW sold its stake in Death Row back to co-owners Jimmy Iovine and Ted Field[29] and soon after it sold off its share in Interscope to MCA Music Entertainment.
The upheaval at Warner was beneficial to its rivals, who picked up valuable executives who had left Warner. Goldberg moved over to Mercury Records; Morris joined MCA Music Entertainment Group and led its reorganization into Universal Music Group, now the world's largest record company. In November 1995, Fuchs was himself sacked by Levin, leaving the company with a reported US$60 million "golden parachute",[30] and Time Warner co-chairmen Robert A. Daly and Terry Semel took over the running of the music division.[31][32]
In 1998, Seagram boss Edgar Bronfman Jr. held talks aimed at merging Seagram's Universal Music, headed by Morris, with the venerable British recording company EMI, but the discussions came to nothing; Bronfman then oversaw Universal's takeover by Vivendi. WEA meanwhile continued to expand its publishing empire, buying a 90% stake in the Italian recording and music publishing group Nuova Fonit Cetra.
Also in 1998, Time Warner bought the remaining 50% of the Rhino Records label they did not own. The Rhino Records retail store in Los Angeles was not included. Rhino then began reissuing the back catalogues of the Warner/Reprise and Elektra/Asylum labels. In 1999 Rhino launched Rhino Handmade, which released limited-edition reissues of lesser-known but still-significant recordings from the WEA labels.
2000s[edit]
In 2000, Time Warner merged with leading American internet service provider AOL to create AOL Time Warner. The new conglomerate again tried (and failed) to acquire EMI, and subsequent discussions about the takeover of BMG stalled, with Bertelsmann eventually offloading BMG into a joint venture with Sony. In 2002, AOLTW further consolidated its hold over the publishing industry, buying 50% of music publisher Deston Songs from Edel AG. By the early 2000s, however, the effects of the dot-com crash had eroded AOL's profits and stock value, and in 2003 the Time Warner board sidelined its under-performing partner by dropping AOL from its business name.[33]
Looking to reduce its debt load, Time Warner—the corporate successor to Warner Communications—sold Warner Music Group in 2004 to a group of investors led by Edgar Bronfman Jr. for US$2.6 billion. This spinoff was completed on February 27, 2004. In the 2004 transition to independent ownership, WMG hired record industry heavyweight Lyor Cohen from Universal Music Group (the result of the merger between the PolyGram and MCA label families) to attempt to reduce cost and increase performance. Contrary to common belief, Time Warner no longer retains any ownership in WMG, though it had the option to re-acquire up to 20% of WMG for three years following the closing of the transaction.[34] WMG's current logo is the former Warner Communications logo (originally designed by Saul Bass) and is used under license by its former parent, which retains full ownership and control of the Warner trademarks.[35]
Once free of Time Warner, WMG began cutting costs by offloading loss-making or low-earning divisions. Like its rival EMI, Warner reacted to the growth of the digital music market by making a historic change, moving out of record production by closing or selling off disc-pressing plants, particularly in territories such as the USA and the Netherlands, where production costs are high. The US manufacturing operations were sold to Cinram in 2003, before the purchase from Time Warner.
In 2005, the Miami-based Warner Bros. Publications, which printed and distributed a broad selection of sheet music, books, educational material, orchestrations, arrangements and tutorials, was sold to Alfred Music Publishing, although the sale excluded the print music business of WMG's Word Music (church hymnals, choral music and associated instrumental music).
On May 3, 2006, WMG apparently rejected a buyout offer from EMI.[36] Then WMG offered to buy EMI and it also rejected the offer. In August 2007, EMI was purchased by Terra Firma Capital Partners.[37] Talk of a possible WMG acquisition of EMI was fanned once again in 2009 after WMG executed a bond offering for $1.1 billion, which brought to light WMG's relatively strong financial position, which was contrasted with the weakened and debt-laden state of EMI.[38] The same year WMG acquired Rykodisc and Roadrunner Records.
On December 27, 2007, Warner announced that it would sell digital music without Digital Rights Management through AmazonMP3, making it the third major label to do so.[39] In 2008, The New York Times reported that WMG's Atlantic Records became the first major record label to generate more than half of its music sales in the U.S. from digital products.[40] In 2010, Fast Company magazine detailed the company's transformation efforts in its recorded music division, where it has redefined the relationships it has with artists and diversified its revenue streams through its expansion into growing areas of the music business.[41]
In 2007, Warner/Chappell sent a Cease and Desist letter to Walter Ritter, the creator of a freeware program called PearLyrics that was used to find lyrics of songs using the internet. In response to wide negative publicity, it subsequently apologized and offered to cooperate with him on the application. However, no subsequent overtures seem to have been made, and the software remains unavailable.[42]
In 2008, WMG, Universal Music, Sony BMG, EMI, and several Indies (via Merlin) together with the Orchard licensed their full back catalogs to the new concept of Spotify in order to fight piracy with a legal way of music streaming.[43] However, in February 2010, WMG announced that it would no longer be licensing music for Spotify and other free streaming services, claiming that they were "clearly not positive for the industry".[44]
In 2009, Warner Music took over its South-East Asian and Korean distributions of EMI audio and video products, including newer domestic releases, which was announced in September 2008. The two companies already enjoyed a successful partnership in India, the Middle East and North Africa, where EMI marketed and distributed Warner Music's physical product from 2005.
2010s[edit]
Warner formed a partnership with MTV Networks in June 2010 that allowed MTVN to exclusively sell ads on WMG's premium content; in turn, views of WMG videos would be counted as views for MTVN. As a result of the alliance, MTV Networks overtook Vevo as the top online music video-sharing network.[45]
In May 2011, the company announced its sale to Access Industries for US$3.3 billion in cash.[46] The price represented $8.25 a share, a 34% premium over the six-month-before average price and a 4% premium over the day-before price but a drop of 70+% since 2007.[47] Access is a conglomerate controlled by Ukrainian-born billionaire Len Blavatnik. "The deal cap[ped] a three-month sale process in which as many as 10 bidders vied" for the company, according to the Wall Street Journal. Blavatnik was a former board member and still-substantial shareholder of WMG at the time of the purchase announcement. Runners-up in the bidding were Los Angeles-based brothers Tom and Alec Gores.[48] Another report valued the sale at US$1.3 billion plus the assumption of US$2 billion of debt, for the same total. This report said cash of US$320 million would change hands in the transaction and that, while further job cuts were likely, CEO Bronfman would continue in his post. The investment group, which has owned the company since 2004 was said to have received a profitable return on its investment, and that Blavatnik's current stake in the company was about 2%. Other unsuccessful bidders included Ron Burkle and No. 2 music company Sony Corp., and Sony and Vivendi SA's Universal Music Group, ranked No. 1, were said to be prospective buyers of parts of WMG going forward.[49] The purchase was completed on July 20, 2011 and the company became private.[2]
In August 2011, Stephen Cooper became CEO of Warner Music Group replacing Edgar Bronfman Jr., who became Chairman of the company.[50] Edgar Bronfman stepped down as Chairman of the company on January 31, 2012.[51]
It was announced on October 31, 2011 that Warner Music Group was once again in talks to acquire EMI's recorded music business, according to The Washington Post. The goal of WMG was to combine with EMI and form a company that would effectively compete with the two other largest music groups: Universal and Sony Music Entertainment. Bloomberg News was reporting that Warner Music had submitted a bid of around $2 billion. However, Universal ended up being the one buying EMI. In 2013, Warner acquired longtime EMI division Parlophone, along with EMI Classics and some regional EMI labels, from UMG for £487 million (around $764.54 million US).[52] Parlophone succeeded Atlantic Records as WMG's oldest unit upon completion of the sale. CEO Stephen Cooper announced plans to launch a classical label, just as American and Brazilian feds approved of the PLG acquisition.[53] The European Union approved the sale in May 2013.[54] After Warner closed on Parlophone, it was announced that the EMI Classics roster was absorbed into Warner Classics and the Virgin Classics roster was absorbed into the revived Erato Records.[55]
In November 2013, WMG paid Universal an additional €30 million; as part of a deal with IMPALA and the Merlin Network, Warner Music is required to auction off a third of the Parlophone acquisition's value.[56] By March 2015, over 140 independent labels had placed bids on over 11,000 Warner Music artists.[57] In April 2016, the first confirmed sale of a Warner Music artist was the back catalogue of English band Radiohead to XL Recordings.[58] Around the end of May 2016, WMG sold the catalogue of Chrysalis Records to Blue Raincoat Music, where Chrysalis' co-founder Chris Wright is now a chairman.[59] In September 2016, Warner Music sold the rights to three of its artists (Guster, Airbourne, and The LeeVees) to Nettwerk.[60] In April 2017, Warner Music agreed to sell the independent distributor Zebralution back to its founders.[61] On June 1, 2017, WMG divested some more artists, including the catalogues of Hot Chip and Buzzcocks to Domino Records, Tom Waits to Epitaph Records; and Mel & Kim, Be Bop Deluxe, Curved Air, Howard Jones, and Kim Wilde to Cherry Red Records. Cosmos Music Group has also acquired a selection of artists.[62] On July 6, Because Music acquired the rights to several London Records artists, including J.J. Cale, Mano Negra, Arno, Tonton David, Happy Mondays and All Saints,[63] while Concord Bicycle Music picked up the rights to albums by Jewel and Sérgio Mendes.[64] Warner Music expects to complete its divestment of artist catalogues by the end of the third quarter of 2017.
On October 29, 2012 Google announced that it had added Warner Music's portfolio to its Google Play Music offerings.[65]
In June 2013, WMG acquired Russian label Gala Records, best known as the longtime distributor of EMI.[66]
In July 2013, WMG closed on its acquisition of Parlophone Label Group.[67] On November 25, 2013, Warner Music announced that it would provide distribution for Disney Music Group in Russia and the CIS.[68]
In September 2013, WMG closed a deal with Clear Channel Media that will see Warner artists paid for terrestrial radio play for the first time. On the other hand, Clear Channel will get preferential rates for streaming songs through its iHeartRadio service and other online platforms. The agreement giving Warner artists special treatment is likely to put pressure on the other big labels, Sony and Universal, to reach similar deals.[69]
On November 14, 2013, Warner Music's releases in the Middle East will now be distributed by Universal Music as a result of the integration of EMI's branch in said region.[70] Sony Music India will assume distribution of WMG in India, Sri Lanka, and rest of SAARC countries except Bangladesh.[71] In Turkey, Warner Music's releases continue to be distributed by EMI Music Turkey, a Universal Music Group Company.
In December 2013, Warner Music began operating the wholly owned South African subsidiary after acquiring the Gallo's stakes that they did not own.[72]
In April 2014, WMG announced that it had acquired Chinese record label Gold Typhoon.[73]
In April 2016, WMG agreed to distribute most of BMG Rights Management's catalogue worldwide through Warner's ADA division, though a few frontline releases will remain distributed by other labels.[74] In March 2017, Warner Music and BMG extended their distribution deal to add the worldwide rights to roughly 8,000 albums.[75]
Warner Music UK launched The Firepit in May 2016, a creative content division, innovation centre and recording studio located at their United Kingdom headquarters in London.[76]
Around the end of May 2016, WMG acquired the Indonesian label PT Indo Semar Sakti.[77] Also in 2016, WMG sold its 80% ownership share of Word Entertainment (excluding Word Music, the print music division of Word Entertainment) to Mike Curb (who had previously held a 20% stake in Word Entertainment).
In July 2017, Warner Music acquired the concert discovery website Songkick.[78]
Music publishing[edit]
Warner/Chappell Music dates back to 1811 and the creation of Chappell & Company, a sheet music and instrument merchant in London. In 1929, Jack L. Warner, president of Warner Bros. Pictures Inc., founded Music Publishers Holding Company (MPHC) to acquire music copyrights as a means of providing inexpensive music for films and, in 1987, Warner Bros.' corporate parent, Warner Communications, acquired Chappell & Company. Its printed music operation, Warner Bros. Publications, was sold to Alfred Publishing on June 1, 2005.
Among the historic compositions of which the publishing rights are controlled by WMG are the works of Cole Porter, Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart. In the 1930s and 1940s, Chappell Music also ran a profitable orchestration division for Broadway musicals, with house arrangers of the caliber of Robert Russell Bennett, Don Walker, Ted Royal and Hans Spialek. Between them they had orchestrated about 90% of the productions seen up to late 1941.[79]
List of Warner labels[edit]
Further information: List of Warner Music Group labels
Controversy[edit]
CD price fixing[edit]
Main article: CD price fixing
Between 1995 and 2000 music companies were found to have used illegal marketing agreements such as minimum advertised pricing to artificially inflate prices of compact discs in order to end price wars by discounters such as Best Buy and Target in the early 1990s.[80] A settlement in 2002 included the music publishers and distributors; Sony Music, WMG, Bertelsmann Music Group, EMI Music, Universal Music. In restitution for price fixing they agreed to pay a $67.4 million fine and distribute $75.7 million in CDs to public and non-profit groups but admitted no wrongdoing.[81] It is estimated customers were overcharged by nearly $500 million and up to $5 per album.[80]
YouTube[edit]
In December 2008, negotiations between WMG and YouTube broke down.[82] As a result, Warner Music Group has continuously blocked or muted videos on YouTube that feature music recordings belonging to its labels or to its publishing arm, Warner/Chappell Music, citing copyright infringement, although a number of artists were not signed with the label. Although the majority of the blocked videos are not official content of WMG, they include WMG recordings in a minor way normally covered by fair use. Many of these claims to copyright violation not only affect artists who are under record labels owned or distributed by WMG, but also to artists who have songs published and controlled by Warner/Chappell, regardless of label.[83] The issue and opinion of WMG worsened when they began removing and muting songs that are covers rather than just recordings, but on September 21, 2009, CNET reported that Warner Music Group had possibly struck a new deal with YouTube and WMG videos may start appearing back on YouTube within weeks,[84] and it was confirmed on Warner Music Group News and the YouTube Blog on September 29, 2009 that YouTube and Warner Music Group were in a multi-year deal with the two.[85][86] In January 2010, there were new reports of the site's accounts containing covered songs being completely closed due to intervention by WMG,[87] and it appears that an end solution has not been found as of February 1, 2012.
Music streaming services[edit]
In February 2010, CEO Edgar Bronfman Jr. said that WMG will stop licensing its songs to free music streaming services. He said that the focus will be on services that require payment, creating an increase in boycotts of the label.[88] The label also drew criticism for refusing to put its music on Google's music site Google Music, but relented a year after the public release of Google Music with an announcement on October 29, 2012 that it had added its music portfolio to Google's offerings.[65]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



List of record labels
List of Warner Music Group artists

References[edit]


^ "Warner Music Group Corp. Company Profile – Yahoo! Finance". Biz.yahoo.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ a b Christman, Ed (July 20, 2011). "Access Industries Completes Acquisition of Warner Music Group". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ Warner Music Canada Ltd. – The Canadian Encyclopedia
^ David Seay (August 31, 1996). "WEA at 25". Billboard. p. 36. 
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 146
^ a b "Stay Tuned By Stan Cornyn: Maitland Moves On". rhino.com. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 146–147
^ Goodman, 1997, p. 248
^ "Kinney Record Group International". 
^ a b Seay, 1996, p. 40
^ "Time Warner: Landmarks". ketupa.net. 
^ "Kinney Set Up Distrib Corp To Handle Labels in 8 Key Cities". Billboard. July 3, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Brian Blevins (March 27, 1971). "Kinney-CBS Enters Joint Distrib and Pressing Deal in England". Billboard. p. 54. 
^ "Kinney Group Gets Rolling Stones Disks". Billboard. April 17, 1971. p. 3. 
^ Connie Bruck (November 17, 2015). "Master of the Game". Retrieved August 30, 2015. 
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 240–241
^ Goodman, 1997, pp. 249–250
^ "1977 Top 100 Cash Box Archives". 
^ "Super Seventies Almanac". 
^ "Timeline". Warner Music Group. 2009. Retrieved January 17, 2012. 
^ Roger Cohen (December 21, 1992). "The Creator of Time Warner, Steven J. Ross, Is Dead at 65". New York Times. Retrieved February 22, 2010. 
^ a b c d e f g Chuck Philips (May 3, 1995). "Warner Music Chief Expected to Quit Today". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Sheila Rule (January 29, 1993). "Ice-T and Warner Are Parting Company". New York Times. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (November 1, 1994). "Rifts Shake and Rattle Warner Music". The New York Times. 
^ Chuck Phillips (August 16, 1994). "Company Town at Warner Bros. Records, Mo Ostin Loyal to the End". Los Angeles Times. 
^ "Michael Ostin: Executive Profile & Biography - Businessweek". Businessweek.com. 
^ Sallie Hofmeister (October 28, 1994). "Warner Music Officials Settle a Power Struggle". New York Times. 
^ a b Mark Landler (May 4, 1995). "Time Warner Replaces Chairman of Music Group With HBO Chief". New York Times. 
^ Mark Landler (September 28, 1995). "Time Warner to Sell Stake in Rap Label". New York Times. 
^ Cityfile profile: Michael J. Fuchs
^ Mark Landler (November 17, 1995). "The Music, and the Dissonance, at Time Warner". New York Times. 
^ Philips, Chuck (November 17, 1995). "Company Town : SHAKE-UP AT TIME WARNER : A Very Bizarre Year at Time Warner : Chronology: Industry waits to see if established and new artists defect to rivals in wake of executive turnover at music giant". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved May 27, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner". ketupa.net. 
^ Warner Music Group Digital Properties. "Warner Music Group - Investor Relations - News Release". wmg.com. 
^ When Time Warner sold its publishing division to Hachette Livre in 2006, the following legend appeared on its newly published books until Warner Books was renamed Grand Central Publishing: "Warner Books and the W logo are trademarks of Time Warner Inc. or an affiliated company. Used under license by Hachette Book Group USA, which is not affiliated with Time Warner Inc." However, no such legal fineprint notice has ever appeared on any Warner Music product since it was sold by Time Warner.
^ "Warner Music Group Statement Regarding EMI Proposal". WMG. May 3, 2006. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ "Profile: British music giant EMI". BBC News. January 15, 2008. Retrieved March 20, 2009. 
^ Analysis: WMG's Moves Could Make Room for M&A
^ Leeds, Jeff (December 28, 2007). "Amazon to Sell Warner Music Minus Copy Protection". The New York Times. Retrieved December 28, 2007. 
^ Digital Sales Surpass CDs at Atlantic
^ Michael Fitzgerald (July 1, 2010). "Take Us to the River: How Warner Music and Its Musicians Are Combating Declining Album Sales". Fast Company. 
^ "What ever happened to pearLyrics?". December 12, 2006. Retrieved August 9, 2008. 
^ Spotify AB (October 7, 2008). "Spotify Announces Licensing Deals and Upcoming Launch". prnewswire.co.uk. 
^ Ian Youngs (February 10, 2010). "Warner retreats from free music streaming". BBC News. 
^ Smith, Ethan (September 8, 2010). "MTV Overtakes Vevo as Top Online Music Destination". Wall Street Journal (Speakeasy Blog). 
^ Yinka Adegoke (May 6, 2011). "Blavatnik's Access wins Warner Music for $3.3 billion". Reuters. Retrieved May 9, 2011. 
^ Wilkerson, David B., "Warner Music to be sold in 3 billion cash deal".
^ Smith, Ethan (May 6, 2011). "Deal Values Warner Music at $3.3 Billion". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 6, 2011. 
^ "Warner Music Group being sold for $1.3 billion to Access Industries amid industry decline". Washington Post. AP. May 6, 2011. Retrieved May 6, 2011. [dead link]
^ Christman, Ed (August 19, 2011). "Warner Music CEO Edgar Bronfman, Jr. and Chairman Stephen Cooper Switch Jobs". Billboard. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Updated: Edgar Bronfman Jr. to Step Down as Warner Music Group Chairman, No Successor Named". Billboard. December 5, 2011. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "Warner Music Group to acquire the Parlophone Label Group". WMG. Retrieved February 7, 2013. 
^ Ingham, Tim. "Warner plans £45m annual cost-savings from Parlophone acquisition". Music Week. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Updated: Warner Music Group’s Acquisition of Parlophone Approved by European Commission". Billboard. November 1, 2012. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner clarifies future of EMI and Virgin Classics artists". classical-music.com. 
^ Tim Ingham (August 3, 2015). "Warner Music Group paid more money for Parlophone than we thought... - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ Tim Ingham (March 19, 2015). "Warner '50 times oversubscribed' as 140 indies bid for assets - Music Business Worldwide". Music Business Worldwide. 
^ http://consequenceofsound.net/2016/04/radioheads-back-catalog-purchased-by-xl-recordings-report/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-chrysalis-records-back-to-chris-wright-and-blue-raincoat/
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-artist-catalogues-nettwerk-divestment-process-picks-pace/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7744636/warner-music-sells-digital-distributor-zebralution
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/warner-sells-flurry-copyrights-indie-divestment-process-heads-towards-finish-line
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/confirms-acquisition-london-records-catalogue
^ https://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/concord-buys-yet-multi-million-dollar-deal-warner
^ a b Sisario, Ben (October 29, 2012). "Google Signs Deal With Warner Music Group - NYTimes.com". Mediadecoder.blogs.nytimes.com. Retrieved February 18, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music se implanta en Rusia tras comprar el sello Gala – BioBioChile". M.biobiochile.cl. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ "Warner Music Group Closes on Acquisition of Parlophone Label Group". Billboard. July 1, 2013. Retrieved July 22, 2013. 
^ Kozlov, Vladimir (November 25, 2013). "Disney, Warner Music Strike Russia Distribution Deal". The Hollywood Reporter. 
^ Atkinson, Claire (September 12, 2013). "Warner artists get paid for radio play under landmark Clear Channel deal". New York Times. Retrieved September 14, 2013. 
^ EMI Music Arabia November 14, 2013. Retrieved on 2013-12-01.
^ Jagannathan, K. T. (December 11, 2013). "Sony, Warner ink licensing deal". The Hindu. Chennai, India. 
^ "Warner announces launch of new South African business". Complete Music Update. December 6, 2013. Retrieved December 13, 2013. 
^ "Warner Acquires Gold Typhoon Group To Grow China Presence". Billboard. 
^ http://www.allaccess.com/net-news/archive/story/152757/warner-music-group-lands-distribution-for-bmg-cata
^ http://www.musicbusinessworldwide.com/bmg-moves-distribution-8000-albums-warners-ada/
^ http://www.billboard.com/articles/news/7385124/warner-music-uk-firepit
^ http://www.completemusicupdate.com/article/warner-music-group-does-deals-with-times-music-and-pt-indo-semar-sakti/
^ http://www.billboard.com/biz/articles/news/digital-and-mobile/7865999/warner-music-acquires-songkick-the-concert-discovery
^ "The Boys That Make the Noise". Time. July 5, 1943. 
^ a b Stephen Labaton (May 11, 2000). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". The New York Times. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ David Lieberman (September 30, 2002). "5 Music Companies Settle Federal Case On CD Price-Fixing". USA Today. Retrieved 2016-04-26. 
^ Kafka, Peter (December 20, 2008). "Warner Music Group Disappearing From YouTube: Both Sides Take Credit". AllThingsD. Retrieved January 14, 2012. 
^ "YouTube Hits The Mute Button as Royalty Fight With Warner Bros. Continues". Rolling Stone. 
^ "YouTube, Warner Music feud nearing an end". CNET. CBS Interactive. 
^ "Official YouTube Blog: Warner Music Comes Back to YouTube". Official YouTube Blog. 
^ Warner Music Group | News
^ Warner Music gegen Musiker | BASS NEWS
^ Youngs, Ian (February 10, 2010). "Warner quits free music streaming". BBC News. Retrieved April 6, 2010. 


Bibliography[edit]

Fred Goodman (1997). The Mansion on the Hill: Dylan, Young, Geffen, Springsteen and the Head-on Collision of Rock and Commerce. Jonathan Cape/Random House. ISBN 978-0679743774. 

External links[edit]

Official websites


Warner Music Group
Warner Bros. Records
Warner Music Italy
Warner Music Latina
Warner Music China
Warner Music Korea
Warner Music Indonesia
Warner Music Japan


Other resources


44437738-ab2a-4c4e-b5f5-65d3e9d735a2 Warner Music Group publishing catalog at MusicBrainz
Warner Music Group company profile at Yahoo Business
SEC filings at the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Warner Nashville A&R team contact list







v
t
e


Warner Music Group



Atlantic Records Group



1st & 15th Entertainment
300 Entertainment
Asylum Records
Atlantic Records
Big Beat Records
Big Tree Records
Canvasback Music
Cat Records
Chopper City Records
Cotillion Records
CTE World
Custard Records
Eardrum Records/Little David Records
Elektra Records
F-Stop Music
Fort Knocks Entertainment
Fueled by Ramen
Full Surface Records
LaSalle Records
Maybach Music Group
OWSLA
Photo Finish Records
Poe Boy Entertainment
Rebel Rock Entertainment
Roadrunner Records
Stone Flower Records
TAG Recordings
UpFront Records
Vortex Records





Alternative Distribution Alliance



Cordless Recordings
East West Records
Rykodisc





Parlophone Label Group



Ensign Records
Parlophone
Roulette Records
Stateside Records
Zonophone





Rhino Entertainment



Atco Records
Del-Fi Records
Frank Sinatra Enterprises
Rhino Records





Warner Bros. Records Group



Festival Mushroom Records
Helium 3
Loveway Records
Machine Shop Records
Maverick Records
Nonesuch Records
OVO Sound
Reprise Records
Sire Records
Warner Bros. Records





Warner Music Nashville



Atlantic Records Nashville
Fervent Records
Reprise Records Nashville
Warner Bros. Records Nashville





Warner Classics



Erato Records
Teldec Records
Warner Classics





Distribution



Alternative Distribution Alliance
Vevo
Warner Music Vision
WEA International

Warner Music Australasia
Warner Music Canada
Warner Music Latina







Music publishing and licensing



Warner/Chappell Music
(Warner/Chappell Music v. Fullscreen)
Warner Custom Products
Warner Music Group Soundtracks
Warner Strategic Marketing
Warner-Tamerlane Publishing Corp.
WB Music Corp.
WMG Film, Television & Commercial Licensing





Management



Stephen Cooper
Cameron Strang
Dan McCarroll
Peter Gray
Stu Cohen
Mike Caren
Julie Greenwald
Jac Holzman
Robert Hurwitz
John Janick
Craig Kallman
Seymour Stein












v
t
e


Music industry



Companies





Music publishers




BMG Rights Management
EMI Music Publishing
Imagem
Music catalog
Sony/ATV Music Publishing
Universal Music Publishing Group
Warner/Chappell Music






Record labels




Major: Sony Music
Universal Music Group
Warner Music Group
Independent: Independent UK record labels






Retailers




Amazon.com
Fnac
HMV
Online music stores (iTunes Store)
Trans World Entertainment
Virgin Megastores






Live performance




CTS Eventim
Live Nation
LiveStyle
Ticketmaster








Genres



Avant-garde
Blues
Contemporary R&B
Country
Crossover
Dance
Disco
Drum and bass
Easy listening
Electronica
Experimental
Folk
Funk
Gospel
Hip hop
Instrumental
Jazz
Latin
Metal
Motown
New Age
Operatic pop
Pop
Punk
Reggae
Rock
Soul
Soundtrack
World





Sectors and
roles



Album cover design
Artists and repertoire (A&R)
Disc jockey
Distribution
Entertainment law
Music education
Music executive
Music journalism
Music publisher
Music store
Music venue
Musical instruments
Professional audio store
Promotion
Radio promotion
Record label
Record shop
Road crew
Talent manager
Tour promoter





Production




Arrangement
Composer
Conductor
Disc jockey
Hip hop producer
Horn section
Record producer
Recording artist
Rhythm section
Orchestrator
Session musician
Singer

Backup singer
Ghost singer
Vocal coach


Songwriter

Ghostwriter


Sound engineer








Release
formats



Album
Extended play (EP)/Mini album
Maxi single
Single
Gramophone record
Eight-track
Compact cassette
CD
DVD
Streaming media
Broadcasting





Awards





World




World Music Awards






Africa




South African Music Awards (RSA)
Channel O Music Video Awards (RSA)
Nigeria Entertainment Awards (NGR)
The Headies (NGR)






Americas




Grammy Awards (US)
Billboard Music Awards (US)
Billboard Latin Music Awards (US)
American Music Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Music Awards (US)
Juno Awards (Canada)
Latin Grammy Awards (US)
Lo Nuestro Awards (US)
MTV Video Music Awards (US)
BET Awards (US)
Soul Train Music Awards (US)
TEC Awards (US)
iHeartRadio Much Music Video Awards (CAN)
Juno Awards (CAN)
MTV Video Music Brazil (BRA)






Asia and
Oceania




ABU Song Festivals (AS)
ARIA Music Awards (AUS)
Awit Awards (PHL)
Golden Disc Awards (S. KOR)
Golden Melody Awards (TW)
Japan Record Awards
Japan Gold Disc Awards
New Zealand Music Awards (NZ)
Anugerah Juara Lagu (MAS)
Anugerah Industri Muzik (MAS)
Anugerah Musik Indonesia (INA)
Dahsyatnya Awards (INA)
SCTV Awards (INA)
Anugerah Planet Muzik (SIN, MAS, BRU, INA)






Europe




Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Europe Music Awards (EU)
Junior Eurovision Song Contest (EU)
Brit Awards (UK)
Mercury Prize (UK)
MOBO Awards (UK)
Kerrang! Awards (UK)
Classic Brit Awards (UK)
Gramophone Award (UK)
Echo Awards (GER)
Victoires de la Musique (FRA)
Grand Prix du Disque (FRA)
NRJ Music Awards (FRA)
Diapason d'Or (FRA)
Sanremo Music Festival Awards (ITA)
Wind Music Awards (ITA)
MTV Italian Music Awards
Edison Awards (NLD)
Grammis Awards (SWE)
Melodifestivalen (SWE)
Premio Nacional de Música (SPA)
Dansk Melodi Grand Prix (DNK)
Melodi Grand Prix (NOR)
Meteor Music Awards (IRL)
Choice Music Prize (IRL)
Russian Music Awards (RUS)
ZAI Awards/Aurel Awards (SK)
Anděl Awards (CZ)
BBC Music Awards (UK)








Charts



ARIA Charts
Billboard Hot 100
Brasil Hot 100 Airplay
Canadian Hot 100
Gaon Music Chart
Irish Singles Chart
Italian Singles Chart
GfK Entertainment Charts
Entertainment Monitoring Africa
Oricon Charts
New Zealand Singles Chart
SNEP Singles Chart
Sverigetopplistan
UK Singles Chart





Sales
certifications



ARIA
BPI
Music Canada
FIMI
PROMUSICAE
RIAA
SNEP





Publications



Billboard
HitQuarters
Hot Press
Kerrang!
Mojo
Musica e dischi
NME
Q
Rolling Stone
Smash Hits
Top of the Pops





Television





Channels




CMT
TheCoolTV
Fuse
Heartland
Juice
MTV
MTV2
Tr3s
MuchMusic
The Music Factory
Viva
VH1
The Country Network






Series




Idols
Popstars
Star Academy
The Voice
The X Factor
Rising Star








Other



A-side and B-side
Backmasking
Christian music industry
Hidden track
Grammy Museum
Music video
White label
Women in music








 Category
 Commons










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Warner_Music_Group&oldid=790589515"					
Categories: Warner Music GroupAmerican record labelsRecord label distributorsEntertainment companies based in New YorkIFPI membersMedia companies based in New York CityMulti-channel networksCompanies based in ManhattanAmerican companies established in 1958Entertainment companies established in 1958Holding companies established in 1958Media companies established in 1958Record labels established in 19581958 establishments in New YorkBain Capital companiesProvidence Equity Partners companiesPrivate equity portfolio companiesFormer Time Warner subsidiariesHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from April 2014Wikipedia indefinitely move-protected pagesUse mdy dates from July 2016Use American English from July 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishMusicBrainz label not in WikidataArticles with MusicBrainz label links 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתქართულიMagyarNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 19:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
